and this is what i saw...
Adjustment type : 3 Mirco hole type adjustment
Anyway, because this is the internet and freedom of speech exists here, I’ve compiled a series of responses to the question of your qualification because you chose to go to college.
2. Island paint: Chelsea Gray (HC-168); Benjamin Moore.
And while the stigma of self publishing has basically been kicked in the cajones over the past 2 years or so as readers have learned to sift the crap from the cake, these titles are only adding to the crowd.
How are you feeling by the way?
Tammy believes that anyone watching a teenager go through this process would want them to have the drugs as soon as possible. Her daughter was denied them until the age of 16, by which point she already had an adam’s apple, a deep voice and facial hair. She understands all this is hard for people to take in; at the age of 11 her second child had to process the fact that his brother was becoming his sister. Family friends still forget what has happened and ask, “How are the boys?” “It takes a long, long time to come to terms with. It took us about two years to stop crying for our loss and also for the pain that we knew our child was going to have to go through.
Into my own peril.
“Now, Mr. Akram, would you care to carry on with this in my office? Or would you like to take it outside?” the way her face shed all expressions of civilized control of the situation and open friendliness, the way those large eyes met his told that she was all too ready to “take it outside” for real.
- might need to be early to settle housing... if I decide not to stay on residential hall next year.
1/4 Cup Low Fat Buttermilk
It was about that time that I figured out Jesus is no fun and if I want candy, I better start devil worshipping. So I threw my first virgin into a volcano shortly after that and the candy has always been plentiful ever since.
Have you guys made any good recipes lately? Any suggestions for one I can try for my next battle in the kitchen?
Is it my turn again!'
The second is a walk. There’s nothing than releases the pull on food more than a quick jog, walk or even a relaxing stroll around a park. I’m lucky because there’s a nature trail less than 10 minutes walk from the door but for those of you who aren’t that lucky, leave your purse/wallet in the house and walk to the nearest shop. If you have headphones, use them! Music is a good way to lose track of the time and you’ll find yourself out of free time to wander aroudn the kitchen.
The real life Streiber had already written a book made into a movie starring Albert Finney, Wolfen, before being conscious of his alien visitations. And that begs the question: did he write horror because his unconscious knew things his consciousness didn't? As I write this I can feel an alien intelligence looming over my shoulder, but I also write from the unconscious and my unconscious could easily be just fucking around and pretending to be an alien intelligence looming over my shoulder. Often the conscious part of me is only taking dictation. That is what most writers say and it's probably true even of the ones that don't. So is the drive to write and create a way to 'cover memory' even as out unconscious knowing the whole terrifying truth only spoon feeds us little tastes, both to keep its power over us, and to not terrify us into doing something drastic? What if our entire time-space imprisoned notion of three dimensional truth is just a cover memory for the far ghastlier truth of our multiverse's terrible 'eternal now' omnipresence? Is the alien abduction somehow less an intrusion into reality than a removal of illusion? Do aliens manipulate time as well as space? If so they may abduct a human for years all while he's sleeping or meditating for only a few minutes in our time. And what's the difference between, say, an alien probe scar on the back of one's neck, and the sudden manifestation of the stigmata, or the way people die for real when they die in The Matrix?
I’m home now. Finally. Well, I’m not really at home but I’m in the vicinity.
But he feels he needs a huge change, so he packs it all up, and he moves his family to Kentucky where he intends to start a new life away from the memories...
Goats and enormous cow bells rang
11. Long, Long - Mars Villa
We have begun to equate fame and greatness in our culture and they are not the same things. Just because someone is famous doesn't make them great, and just because someone is great doesn't mean they will be famous. The idea that our kids will not be great has led us to the place where parenting is in the US today. It is a little thing I like to call "friendship parenting."
Then why is it whenever anyone asks me about the concert, one of the first things I talk about is the bacon-wrapped hot dog I had outside the venue after the show? Read More...
Yes, Mum now knows I’m an Atheist. Yes, it definitely disappoints her that my children are Atheists. Yes, she prays for us. But, she’s also said, in the last few years, that she doesn’t like the Catholic Church either, but, says ‘I believe in God, and it doesn’t matter which church I go to, it’s all the same God’. But then, she only goes a few times a year now.
Now if we could just fast forward to November and get this ridiculous election over with, let Obama get on with the sisyphian task of pulling our country out of the doldrums.....but oh yes, I'm here to speak about books, aren't I?
1 decide
Draupadi’s Desendents was funded by PSBT and directed by Oindrilla Hazra. It was an attempt to cover all aspects of bride trafficking. It is first film where we can find such ethnic-track of bride buying and trafficking. It also covered Honor based crimes. The Haryana police are using this documentary as IEC material in police training and police gender sensitization workshops.
With summer just around the corner, my thoughts turn to lovely, golden hoppy beers and June was the month that I first came in to contact with a brewery that makes superbly hoppy and flavour packed beers, The Tempest Brewing Co. My first pint of Tempest was in June at The Scottish Real Ale Festival when I had a pint or two of their Rye PA. I was to later immerse myself in a night of nothing but Tempest at their Tap Takeover event at Edinburgh's Bow Bar.
“A federal judge who spent a decade presiding over one of the most contentious environmental court fights in the Northwest — the fate of endangered salmon in the Columbia River Basin and four hydroelectric dams that interrupt their migration — has said in a recorded interview that the dams should be removed to help the fish. “I think that we need to take those dams down,” the judge, James A. Redden of Federal District Court in Portland, Ore., told Idaho Public Television in an interview for a documentary to be released this summer. “And I’ve never ordered them, you know, or even tried to order them, that you’ve got to take those dams down, but I have urged them to do some work on those dams and they have done it.”
1/2 cup of pitted cherries
Oh, right, the Casey Anthony case put the lie to that one.
Dancing alignments of all past loves and mistakes
A native of Trim, Co. Meath he is the leader of The Meath Writers' Circle which was founded in 1992. They meet on the first Thursday of every month in Trim Castle Hotel. Tommy has written 12 books including "With the Boyne Through Trim", "Stella's Cottage" and "Where was Wellington Born?" He has collected 40 awards for literature including The Poet of Fingal Trophy and the Nora Fahy prize.
Expansion of houseboats is said to have been carried out during Mughal period and later, the Europeans further modernised them along with the boatmen of the day. Dal Lake is home to more than a thousand houseboats known for their unique luxury, mostly having 2 to 6 double bedrooms with modern facilities. The interiors of the houseboat can be compared with a palace or a modern boutique hotel. Houseboats ore designed with Walnut and Deodar wood work and the base is made of a special wood that makes it float for decades. It is advisable to book a room in advance directly with the owner or a travel agent. The centuries old hospitality culture of the houseboat owners and their endless efforts to promote tourism in the valley is worth of appreciation. A stay in houseboats in Dal Lake is always a memorable experience for every tourist, a not-to-be-missed experience.
It won't be difficult for you to guess what we did: we ate. Quite a bit. And we cooked!
So, in the next post, we're going to look at a couple of ways to work out WHAT HAPPENS NEXT, including revisiting that diamond-shaped diagram that I showed you before. Stand by for that. And if anyone has any more specific ideas about plotting, toss them in the comments and I'll try to work them in.
“See that up the road?” The white-haired nickel miner slowed his beat up oldwheeler to idle. Its ancient petro engine shot white puffs into the freezing morning air.
So when a 10-year-old girl who watches Eureka now sees that a woman–and a woman of color, at that–can be the head of an elite science and technology research company, she’s far, far more likely to think she might be able to have a career like that, too. Even if such a portrayal isn’t necessarily an authentic representation of the way the world is now, it’s still valuable; it’s a portrayal of the way the world should be, and will be if today’s kids believe it’s possible.
APC is considered as the global leader in integrated critical power and cooling services; and also provides industry leading product, software and systems for home, office, data center, and factory floor applications. IP Converge is the information technology and telecommunications subsidiary of publicly-listed IPVG Corp. It provides a wide array of managed data services and business solutions.
I hope you enjoy it too.
Have a great day
To make the sabji/bhaji/veggie
With an apparent immigrant underclass already established in Canada's major urban centres importing record numbers of more immigrants into the country will make matters worse. Marry this to youth unemployment and what you have is a disaster in the making.
It’s no secret around here that we all pretty much want a boy. Brandon for the sheer fact it would be his first boy. Me for the sheer fact that well…it’s time for another boy.The kids because well the boys are feeling a little outnumbered.
Spring 1540 - I am afraid. You are in grave danger. Mother, will you run away with me if I can free you?
In actual fact I don’t know what I am doing, whetting my appetite in this way with a ‘which chocolate out of the box’ approach to film choice. The reality of the situation is that when the ticket office opens at 9am next Thursday there will be an online scrum worthy of a sell out pop concert, resulting in roughly a three minute space when it is possible to book tickets, so it will be less a question of choosing which film and more hitting the purchase button at random – knowing my luck I’ll end up with “The Inbetweeners Movie’ billed as the adventures of “a group of 18 year old boys in search of their first sexual experience”. Call me a boring middle aged woman but I’d rather remove purple dye from the newly painted white kitchen door - on which happy note …….
(4) Guido Ignatius Chabrat, Coadjutor of Louisville
Seattle has two great things going for it: A vibrant performing arts community as well as a generous community dedicated to animal welfare. Isn’t it time those two come together for an extraordinary night of fun and philanthropy?
One thing it hasn't been, though, is too much of a struggle. Sure, there have been some REALLY hard years with behavior issues, lack of administrative support with certain students, etc. Those years, however, weren't hard on me intellectually, though. At the end of the day, I still showed up the next day to teach. Now that I have switched schools, I have less of those hard days and more days where I am intellectually challenged by my students. It's pretty good right now, but how long will I do this? Is this what I want to do for the next 25 years?
Again, you gotta play it LOUD. Tell me the outro, that delayed arpeggio stuff at the end (is that right? Arpeggio?), when the chord resolves back down at the very end…. tell me you don’t want that running over the end of the trailer of your movie when it fades to the title screen followed by the COMING NEXT SUMMER screen. Getting chills just typing it. The studio version is great, but when you see/hear it live… that song absolutely sets shit off.
We all tried on a couple dresses and this was the one I picked. It was a bit snug but I wanted some motivation. Unfortunately when I went to check out, we realized this was not one of the dresses we could get in the mercury color, so I had to pick a different dress. I liked the new one too, but it wasn't quite as different or snug, which is probably good. It was also cheaper than the first dress.
We mixed Funk and Soul with Rock n’Roll
warm sand
I came down these. I could have gone up too.
Don't know what the promised video version would have entailed, but as usual I see faint images of dry ice, shots from below into the lights and ungainly close-ups of a sweaty brow.
In order to achieve his goals, Xavier establishes his school for gifted youngsters. Part of his objective is to teach young mutants how to not only control their powers, but to use them as a force for good in the world. This is best illustrated in the graphic novel X-Men: Season 1 that retold the early days of the original X-Men. In one particular moment, after a training session, Xavier is talking to Scott Summers better known as Cyclops. Scott is afraid of his powers, his optic blasts, namely because he cannot look at anybody without some type of filter to shield his eyes. His blast is so strong that unharnessed it could punch a hole in a mountain, or as Wolverine points out in an argument in the first X-Men film, “Hey, I wasn’t the one who gave Grand Central a new sun roof.”
When you see most blogs, you have to wonder why their “publishers” ever got out of bed to do them. Trivia! Drivel! Published so that their publishers can say they have a blog… rather than to say something timely! Significant! Motivating!
I slide by hazel covers;
Carry on and be safe!
www.sowetanlive.co.za/news/
H.B.Warner Victoria the Great
“Humph,” said Marian, sniffing at her tea. “Far as I’m concerned, the best thing about living way out here is not having folks to talk to.”
Cherubs are well, reports have been finished, study is still frying my brain ( in the best way possible)...just scrapping has been thin on the ground.
The ladies of The View trotted out former NYC Mayor Rudy Giuliani to thank him for his leadership in the aftermath of the terrorist attacks. Almost every magazine cover and newscast is asking us to remember.
She did offer that I could just be expressing how I was feeling...
I’m addicted to food.
Two have children, one outside, one in a year perhaps two. One has recently been sick soon travelling away; the other one has been away, now just coming home, and the last stayed both “home and away” teaching the skills of believes.
And there is a monthly card challenge where you can win $25 to shop at their store! That can buy you a pound of rubber! :) The theme for April is "Earth day" Just make a card using Viva Las Vegastamps! and post it to your blog then go to our blog to the tap where it says monthly challenge and link your blog post of the card to our blog. :)
New photo a day challenge! Follow along on twitter or instagram @mrssmcp, if you like. I didn't take a picture for yesterday, so I was behind but caught up today (oops). I'll post the last pictures from March soon.
3/4 t salt
Notes on Ingredients: I used Pikesville rye, Martini & rossi vermouth, and Angostura orange bitters.
I have several film and television projects in 2012. I get to play a school principal in two Disney films (‘The Lucky One’ and ‘The Odd Life Of Timothy Green’), an Obstetrician in ‘What To Expect When You’re Expecting’, a counselor in ‘Firelight’ (ABC) and ‘Army Wives’ (Lifetime) and a government worker in ‘Arthur Newman Golf Pro’. It’s kind of funny to me that I keep booking utilitarian roles when I’m actually really silly.
And so, finally, to FritzAle IPA, a beer that was also recommended via Twitter. FritzAle is brewed at the Helios Braustelle in Cologne, presumably by Fritz renting time at the brewery, as are other beers like the Freigeist Bierkultur stuff. Having visited in the past, and liking what Braustelle do, I had high hopes for this, despite the daunting 750ml size. The garishly-coloured bottle lists Amarillo and Simcoe as hops of choice, bittered to a respectable 59 IBUs, and a regular 5.5% ABV. I'll cut to the chase. Brilliant. Big, fresh aroma, hitting classic American hop characteristics of piles of grapefruity, citrussy goodness. The flavour is certainly hop-forward and fresh, on a creamy fudge base, bready with the added bonus of pineapple sorbet, lashed with a luscious, yet drying pithy bitterness that goes on and on. Masses of flavour, wonderful balance, and the whole thing just works! Try it if you can.
Well, off to more research…
and then, bam!
So, if the giant impact hypothesis doesn’t explain the moon, how did it get there? One possibility is that a glancing blow from a passing body left Earth spinning so rapidly that it threw some of itself off into space like a shot put, forming the disk that coalesced into the moon. This would explain why the moon seems to be made entirely of Earth material. But there are problems with this model, too, such as the difficulty of explaining where all the extra angular momentum went after the moon formed, and the researchers aren’t claiming to have refuted the giant impact hypothesis.
Fuck you Alternative radio
statistic is for complications occurring witn a VBAC ... not fatal
I am a lifelong student of Physics. I have been a student long beforeI got my PhD in Physics. I am currently a Distinguished Scientist at a Government Lab. This is first review (and possibly the last) I’ve written for an Amazon book, but I felt compelled to write this after reading this book. It is an excellent example of a ‘true’ teacher at work who understands how to relate information. This is an art form.
But despite the lack of clarity, I do have hope. I have a rich, settled feeling in the very center of myself now that I'll figure it out. Small signs let me know that.
The Season, being the best resource for romances out there has released their list of new HR novels to look out for in November. I’ve picked some of my personal to-buy books which I will present to you:
2. Okpani Ya
Back in the real world, I'm moving forward with my plans. It seems that building websites and designing logos takes up much more time than writing blog posts. Luckily, I am really good at one of those tasks, so it's done. The other (websites) has taken much longer than I expected. I have logos, but why is it so difficult to create a website? Actually, it's not that hard. Acquiring the program to create such websites has been a struggle, and the time to sit and design exactly what I want has been very, very time consuming. But I'm working on it.
And hoping there's a market for it...
Now needed was shelter, so the next thing on Dad's agenda was to find them a house to live in. He walked several more miles that day to find Charlie Milhorn, a man heavily into real estate. He owned many houses in the area of Johnson City, many of them just shacks. There was such a one - three rooms that was currently empty, situated between my grandmother's and the house that Daddy had bought a few months before. We lived with my grandmother when the house became available and at a price affordable for Mom and Dad. A stroke of luck it was being so close to Mussie's.
twitter.com/djstatic222
The sins of the past revisit me on a regular basis, like old friends greeting me with half-bitter warmth. In the daze following the end of my relationship, I found my feet revisiting familiar roads, my eyes revisiting memory in the old haunts.
6. The Judge is bias
“The … effect of the inclusion of midstream commentary is the blurring of the line between inspired word and human opinion,” wrote Coralie.
Pourboire: once the tomato season arrives (not soon enough), feel free to add heirlooms to the mix — a grilled version that just somewhat resembles classic ratatouille.
I moved in to begin the teasing and exploring with my hand. “What are you doing, I just want my chain pulled,” he sounded a little desperate. “Well, if you don’t prime the pump you won’t draw water.” My little devil was having a field day.
over the moon.
The Ritual Complex: Purpose And Result
It's kind of a big deal.
* Northwestern University - Illinois (USA)
No medicine for my pain
And I have to say a BIG HUGE THANK YOU to everyone who’s supported me during this cycle, it’s been a lot of hard work, and I couldn’t have done it without my fantastic friends, family, and running partners. My biggest thank you has to go to Cath, who ran something like 270 kms with me over Feb, March, and April! How lucky am I to have a close friend to run with that often? Very lucky!
I've begun to notice something, a little trend. Around the time the geese, hummingbirds and the snowbirds begin to make their way southward the temperatures start to dip for little bit. Usually it's just for a day or two. This year the exodus southward was so large they dragged the jet-stream down with them for a whole week, causing a drastic weather change. According to Pearl, the homeless were headed this way in droves. I haven't noticed an increased amount of homeless every winter. Though we do have way more than I've seen in other places.
The first promotional mailing, as explained in Chapters 2 and 7 of my report, was highly deceptive. The first mailing promised "10,000 new permanent jobs," while other promotional material acknowledged that jobs would also be "retained" (i.e., moved from Manhattan) and, of course, now there's much less office space. The first mailing came from the vague entity "Atlantic Yards," which happened to be located at Forest City Ratner's offices. The developer was not mentioned. And the mailing used a quote attributed to the New York Times ("Almost everything the well-equipped urban paradise must have") that was 1) from the architecture critic and 2) did not include the double disclosure of the critic's and the Times's ties to Ratner. Times Standards Editor Allan Siegal later told project critics that use of the logo was improper.
The Rowing Fisherman Routine has a great advantage over the slow Tai Chi forms practiced today. Tai Chi works the legs strongly – and puts particular pressure on the knees – but the upper body and arms are not really `tasked’ to a great degree. The Rowing Fisherman is kind to the knees; using narrow stances with equal weight distribution and weight transfer more like normal walking. It also distributes the workload of exercise evenly throughout the body, with the arms and upper body getting a work out on the par with the legs.
Getting started...
1 yeast cake: 3 hr. to rise
However, sources say the Hells Angels and their puppet club, the Zig Zag Crew, have been quietly regrouping in recent months. Little did they know police were watching their every move.
Likewise, there was once a vogue for drinking in hotel bars, but the hotel trade has changed, with many of the established “coaching inns” being converted for other use, and I don’t think that hotel bars are seen as anything like so aspirational nowadays, tending to cater mainly for captive residents.
The album ends with the classic Hawkwind tune: Moorcock and Brock's 'Kings of Speed'; a track that somehow encapsulates all that both the writer and the band stood for during this period.
Next to unattainable.
I’ll be posting more quotes here and on the quotes page. Hope you enjoy
Colin had to leave us after a week, work beckoned. Mum and Dad stayed with us until the end and it was absolutely great…. thanks for coming out to see us.
Me: Dude why do you drive like an old lady
In my house now I have a plastic shoe box full of crayons. But most of them are not the sharp, well-cared-for crayons of my childhood. They are little nubs of color, with peeling paper and no visible names. There are lots of colors in there and I pull them out for the kids weekly. They like the big box of crayons. As I processed this summer, I realized that I feel like if my life were a coloring book, this summer I used the big box of sharp crayons to color. It’s like the colors are brighter, the lines are more precise, and we used all the really cool, unique colors.
For you never know how much time is left
Something that I found rather interesting, when I’m trying to make some comparison between Islam and Judaism, is the thought of Hadiths (or rather Ahadith, since it’s plural). Mostly since I often try to explain the relation between Written and Oral Torah in Judaism, as the relation between Qur’ân and Hadith, though it would be more correct to describe it as the relation between Qur’ân and Sunnah. Well, that is the correct comparison. The Mishnah though is to Judaism what the compilations of Ahadith is to Islam.
Available Disney Resorts for this Special Vacation Package are:
jom2 datang ramai2...
5. Database Integration – The MFT should readily connect to DB2, SQL Server, Oracle, MySQL and other popular database servers for extracting and inserting data.
And Joseph also went up from Galilee, out of the city of Nazareth, into Judea, unto the city of David, which is called Bethlehem; (because he was of the house and lineage of David:)
Then after that – at the end of a day’s work – he would invite a select few to come into his office on the Paramount lot. He’d pour little shots of vodka and we would just sit and he and everybody would discuss politics. And, of course, he was a very fierce and active liberal, and he was brilliant with his observations about everything. And I would just sort of hang out in there. And then when we were all back in New York – where he lived and I lived – he’d invite me over to his house for screenings – including one of Skidoo. He was charming. He could be very cruel, but like a lot of such people, they’re also capable of being unusually kind. When I was in a play, he would come see it. And he kept wanting me to be in some other film of his after that, but he never came up with a part that he thought I was right for.
the two beautiful spirits
As you may have noticed over the past two weeks, Pottermore, the Harry Potter point and click adventure thing, has finally opened its doors to the rest of the world. I actually managed to get into the beta, but they never sent my e-mail, so I had to wait until two weeks ago to finally register. It’s been fun watching it spread among my college—people have been declaring their Houses all over the place. I didn’t think it would matter to me what House I got sorted into on the website, but I found myself getting nervous when the message from J. K. Rowling popped up before the actual sorting. Luckily, it proved me a Hufflepuff, which I’ve known for years. In any case, while I was exploring the first book’s content on the website, I found myself pushing through just to get to all the new content Rowling has provided. But when I was done, I felt a bit… well, sullied and unusual, to quote Captain Jack.
Silver Thornbridge Versa 5.0
To be perfectly honest I find this quite frightening, and not because I believe this is simply a cynical ploy by Sarkozy to win back some of his previous supporters who deserted him in favour of Jean-Marie Le Pen, who has recently done very well in the elections in France. No, it is because in my opinion there are other far-reaching implications of such intrusive legislation, which I shall attempt to explain.
Yes we want to see ribbon and lace on your creation if you hadnt guessed. i have used some gorgeous silk binding as my ribbon and some lovely lace from Prima that I have had hidden in the drawer for quite some time and quite frankly..lol...had forgotten about!
Kachina Lodge,
And despite there being cutsey songs — this movie has profanity and such. It’s not for kids. If you want a cute movie — this isn’t it. If you want a disgusting movie masked as a cute movie — this is it.
A great pick for fans of Philip Pullman's Sally Lockhart series of teen Victorian mysteries.
I have two posts for you today - later on today I'll have an artsy project to share with you.
He scares me to death now, but for entirely different reasons. Now I can handle his looks, his voice, his sweetness, his humor, but his love frightens me. I never planned on falling in love again. I wasn’t sure I would find it, I wasn’t sure I wanted it, I wasn’t sure I deserved it.
Reginald outlined his plan and then had Bertie repeat it back to him four times, to make sure he remembered it correctly. To Reginald’s mild surprise, Bertie appeared to have grasped the plan and gave clear and insightful answers when questioned. Satisfied that they were as ready as they would ever get, Reginald hurried them onward. They covered the rest of the way to the top in less than half an hour and made it near the summit right about mid-day, as planned.
And ... as for what extreme tanning can do to our skin, if you are on a diet, I have a real appetite suppressant for you. Warning: This woman scorched my retinas:
The bottom one is always clipped to my pocket, it is a S & W SWAT with 3.75" blade. I like it because it is one of the few folders that fits my hand and feels comfortable.
The first he slaughter'd, it made him laugh,
Over the last four years, I have published over 3,000 posts. Some are shorter posts, some took me days and over months to plan and execute. Some are my personal comments. Some are simply things I find interesting. I’ve written about Science & Technologies. I’ve done many many interviews (audio or video). Some entries include video reports of provincial and federal ministers. This year, I even reported on Prime minister Harper’s visits to Calgary (twice). I have interviewed successful businessmen in Canada and I have interviewed Oscar winning director plus up and coming directors. I’ve even written food review because I love food.
And a pleasure new and ecstatic, and the prattled yearning of
I was deflated.
To be completely honest, up until very recently I cringed whenever anyone referred to me as a woman. I was not ready, and to be honest, I was still not comfortable in my own skin. There was way too much that I wanted to fix before I became a woman. In a way too, I was procrastinating because I knew that to be the woman I wanted to be, I’d have to turn back and look at the vast expanse of my past. Unfortunately, time does not stand still, and no matter how we fight it, we don’t stand still either.
THE CITY has dropped plans to place four headstones at a 19th-century Flushing cemetery that was long forgotten and became a park - angering advocates fighting to respect its buried dead.
I was so jealous of everyone's awesome outfits! They were so awesome! I am super sad that I was only born in the 80's and didn't get the chance to fully enjoy them. At least I did have a crimper and a short jean skirt.... and Punky Brewster high-top sneakers.
Magic Under Stone: Had a lot of trouble with the beginning. Getting back into the groove of the characters and trying to re-establish everything. This book clicked after I had a dream about Ifra that showed me who his character really was. Everything else fell into place around him, and I ended up mostly enjoying the writing for the second half. Revisions were very minimal.
While Adachi called Lee an icon, there hasn’t been anyone else who has reached that status, but they’re starting to come out.
-Ask residents to clear snow from uncollected refuse and recycling at curbside.
2. I Left My Heart in San Francisco
The lawsuit, which Apple filed in April in a San Jose, California, federal court, says Samsung’s Galaxy products “slavishly” copy the iPhone and iPad. The South Korean electronics maker says Apple’s arguments lack merit.
cotton threads in Cinnamon, Sage & Molasses~
Brainless Corruption is bottled in the standard Brainless Belgian bomber. The only indicator that beer is the "corruption" version is the print on the date/batch area of the bottle.
We still had a whole coconut left over from our Fiji Dinner Night, so this while looking quite delicious, was a no brainer (I didn’t wan’t the coconut to go off before I could use it). Store-bought dessicated coconut, has got nothing on freshly grated coconut!
The reason Rhys felt compelled to write this sort of creative response to Jane Eyre, was because she wanted to re-position and put to the forefront of her readers’ attention the character of Mrs Rochester, the infamous ‘mad woman in the attic’ of Bronte’s original novel. Rhys felt that Bronte had treated Mrs Rochester poorly, not only because she remains in the background, like some scary Gilmanesque wallpaper, but also because of her portrayal there as somewhat two-dimensional – if you think this is unfair, just remind yourself of the depth and complexity Bronte gives her other secondary characters in Jane Eyre). Instead, we meet only disembodied madness, in lieu of any literary effort to convince the reader that she possesses a real identity (and is not simply being possessed!), of her comprising flesh and blood and having her own thoughts and feelings; she certainly has no voice of her own in the original and Bronte seems to think nothing of this (perhaps because of her being influenced by Gothic novelists, as so many 19th century writers were, and in such fiction, mad characters were usually ghoulish and unreal; absurdly so, even). But Rhys, whether rightly or wrongly, also attributed these problems of characterisation to Bronte’s own ideological viewpoint and socialisation (educational and social/societal upbringing): namely one where many of her own class, and others besides, in the 19th century society, were typically pro-colonialist/pro-imperialist and often racist, too (so Mrs Rochester’s Creole history is innately attributed to her madness).
A recent concert appearance in Santa Fe by Fusion pioneer John McLaughlin has reopened this long running debate on the merits of this style of music. He is the pre-eminent Fusion musician on the planet, still releasing new cds and touring all over the world at sixty-eight years of age. He has played the guitar for the last sixty years and has been at the forefront of this highly technical brand of music since its creation in the late 1960’s. No one that has ever seen or heard John McLaughlin play would doubt that he has a tremendous command of the guitar. Not only does he play at times with a blazing pace on the fret board, but he is also a master improviser in the great Jazz tradition. What has made McLaughlin such an imposing figure is that he does have more than just technical virtuosity plugged into his amp. There is a lyricism to the guitar lines that he endlessly weaves, and he has also proven himself to be one of the original innovators in creating a true World Music style. He has played with both Miles Davis and Jimi Hendrix, and that high octane mixture of jazz and rock is what Fusion is all about. His 70’s electric band Mahavishnu Orchestra had some of the best musicians around (Cobham, Goodman, and Hammer), while he later created Shakti as a vehicle to explore his interest in Indian music. Guitarists Jeff Beck and Pat Metheny have both called John the best guitarist in the world, lofty praise from two highly respected musicians. His performance with The Fourth Dimension band was a microcosm of all things good and bad that have been debated about Fusion since its creation. Excessive soloing might be a downer for some, but how do you argue with such mind blowing technical virtuosity? Others might cry about a lack of “songs” (a la Burt Bacharach), but these four musicians exhibited a cohesion rarely seen that trumped any mundane need for familiar tunes. If someone said it sounded like a guitar / drum clinic at times I wouldn’t argue, but what a sound they threw at us! Etienne M’bappe was a revelation with his unique bass lines, while Mark Mondesir kept the drum seat red hot all night long. Keyboardist Gary Husband added a lot of tasteful licks with McLaughlin the whole evening smiling as if he had finally found that lost chord he’d been searching for all these years. John called himself just an aging hippie at one point during the concert, and that humility rang as true as any note from his guitar. Like a Zen master patiently waiting for his future students to find him, McLaughlin has explored the fret board in a variety of styles throughout his life, and has stayed open to its possibilities. Many people aspire to be the best at what they do, but hard work and skill will only get you so far. After many years he came to the realization that a true master doesn’t just play the guitar, you also have to let the guitar play you.
Yesterday it occurred to me that all of this sleeping through the night business started when we started taking Burkley to the chiropractor a couple of weeks ago for his ear infection. I can't say for sure if the two events are related, but it does seem interesting, does it not?
Another area was set aside for horses to be washed down.
Please go over and vote for us Rosebuds over at The Greeting Farm blog. I need all the help I can get! Thanks a bunch!
* "Dip in the Pool" by Roald Dahl
Mediaoutrage- Wow. That’s trifling. SMH in utter disgust. Yea you don’t children like that. Then again, if you’re on TV you don’t do anyone that watches your dusty ass show, like that. We guess that explains why her career is deader than Elvis and Marvin Gaye driving off a cliff. Two more smut pictures of Countess below.
8. Cry Cry Cry
To continue the dream,
Dumbledore, Aslan, Willy Wonka, Bridget Jones and The BFG.
I will post some more photos tomorrow but here's a sneak peek above.
13 march - Mosaic Music Festival - Singapore
I have known mothers that prevented fathers from being in their childrens lives for justified and unjustifiable reasons, and, I’ve watched mothers turn their sons and daughters against their fathers out of spite, for better or worse. I’ve watched fathers living from couch to couch, grinding, never once making excuses for their actions and never once missing a day of work just to pay the rent for apartments they can no longer come home to, or to buy diapers for babies they rarely see when the mothers saw no reasons to resume working. I have also known fathers and mothers that would rather not slow down, and continue their same habits around their children without concern of learned behaviors, as well as known (very well) sons that have killed their fathers to protect their mothers and selves from potentially being raped, beaten, or murdered — sons that too themselves have grown up to be loving, unconditional fathers. I don’t pretend to understand the mentalities that harbor such circumstances, but I have watched how effortlessly a three-year-old learns to pronounce the word, “Dammit” after Mommy breaks a nail, or “Shit” after Daddy steps on a few misplaced legos, and have thus determined that much of our own sentiments, and actions, and beliefs individually and as a collective affect our children regardless to whether we believe it or not, and that scares me. No family dynamic is the same, but in every case, there is a child/children attempting to make sense of its surroundings, always.
It is quite eye-catching due to both its size (it covers a good third of our coffee table) and the gorgeous, photo-like illustration on the cover. Even so, it sat there untouched most of the day. Long about ten p.m., though, Chloe picked it up and started leafing through it. She began giving the dinosaurs clever, funny names, such as "WasInJurassicParkasaurus" for the compy, and "BadAssMohawkasaurus" for a dapper dino with a snazzy fringe on top.
20. The Band Perry “If I Die Young”
But who's got the data on their side?
by EP & X
No never joke ’bout mon-go-loids
1) 260, 320, 360, 380- havent done that as a legitimate squat so was pretty pleased with it.
I was lacking enough purple to totally frame the text so I just framed the ends. I like how this turned out!
"I know you are going to want (insert item here - Tee-hee!)"
To demonstrate the effect I have drawn two wings, one with a large flap and one with a short flap. With the large flap in its closed position you can see a large area of wing exposed in the left of the illustration (shown yellow). When DRS is activated and the wing opens to the maximum 50mm slot gap, the reduction in exposed wing area is noticeable.
"Anything Goes", sponsered by Love to Stamp, so the prize is fantastic.
My first collection/obsession started when I was a child playing in the creek, and I’ve been a rock/fossil/shell collector ever since. They are all over my house; instead of knick-knacks like most people have, my tables and mantle are covered with rocks and fossils. Some are displayed on stands, some sit on shelves, and others fill bowls or baskets here and there.
Beautiful bridal hair flower embellished with ivory silk flower petals, ivory tulle, pearl stamens, barely off white goose and ostrich feathers and russian tulle. Silver double prong hair clip back. Gorgeous with any style veil. A perfect and unique addition to your wedding day attire. Ready to ship and perfectly wrapped.
What is it about her work we all like so much? I think the way she deals with language is part of it. Her descriptions are so lush and lyrical that they are almost edible, and yet she never overdoes it. Her characters have a goodness and luminescence about them which is enchanting (in the literal sense of the word), but they are in no way ‘goodie-goodies’ as many of the other child characters written at the same period are--instead being endearingly human in their failings. There’s just a perfect lightness of touch about her writing which I would certainly aspire to emulate—that you compare me to her in any sense has made my head swell to twice its normal size, and I am overjoyed!
We talk about what would create the best look, rhythm and beat since it is poetry. I personally like to guide students to using the longest line in the middle and building up to it and then going back to smaller phrases. For example in the Green poem it is 1 line, 3 lines, 6 lines, 3 lines, 1 line. The lines don’t have to have the same number
It might even raise the question, is your selfishness helping to downgrade the US credit rating? Or was it really those wicked ratings agencies all the time? Well, Standard & Poor’s is giving a higher rating to securities backed by subprime home loans – the same type of investments that led to the worst financial crisis since the Great Depression, than it assigns to the U.S. government.
Sierra Nevada accomplished the trick by using a new, very rare hop called Citra but keeping all the other settings on normal. It's a distinctive hop and, according to the brewery, it is so rare there are only about three acres under cultivation:
Tomorrow also brings VBS decorating. This year’s theme is a tough one for decorating – Hero Headquarters. But it is a really fun one for stories and the crafts I will be doing. I just pray that the kids hearts would be receptive to the Holy Spirit. I need to spend the rest of tonight planning for the decorating tomorrow and the crafts themselves next week. I have an awesome team that will be doing so much of the work with me. Thank you!
Fashion To Figure is the only fast-fashion retail chain dedicated solely to plus-size women's fashion (focused exclusively on women sizes 12-26). Rapidly expanding with eight physical locations (3 in New Jersey, 5 in New York, and one soon to open in Maryland) and a global web store, FTF provides up-to-the-minute fashion trends at the best prices. With individual service provided by FTF Stylists in an upbeat store environment, guests leave FTF feeling chic, stylish, and supremely confident. FTF was founded by the great-grandsons of Lena Bryant, the fashion revolutionary and businesswoman who founded the special size market more than 100 years ago.
If you’re a fan of adventure, then Ladakh is the place for you. One of the most exciting ways to explore the landscape wonders as well as the remote areas of Ladakh. Crossing the Khardungla pass, considered to be one of the highest motor able roads in the world is a high like never before. Moreover, Ladakh is also a paradise for trekking and mountaineering due to its high peaks and mountains. You can also take part in and enjoy a number of fairs and festivals like the Losar festival, Hemis, Ladakh festival and tak-tok festival.
1 legged
I'm doing an article, a how-to thing and there are a number of sections to it. I know that if I don't put in a TOC, there will be complaint reviews.
I don't tempt fate anymore.
This was completely absent in Schumacher's movies
“Let not your hearts be troubled. Believe in God; believe also in me. In MY Father’s house are many rooms. If it were not so, would I have told you that I go to prepare a place for you? And if I go and prepare a place for you, I will come again and will take you to myself, that where I am you may be also. And you know the way to where I am going.’ Thomas said to him, ‘Lord, we do not know where you are going. How can we know the way?’ Jesus said to him, ‘I am THE Way, and THE Truth (al-haqq), and THE Life (al-hayat). No one comes to the Father except through me. If you had known me, you would have known MY Father also.’” John 14:1-6
To the divine
The deer continue to greet Big B and I every morning. A new development is that some of them are now coming back for lunch. They like to see what sort of leftovers the Rugrats will throw their way.
where it is typically used to justify an over-arching anti-Western
My husband has always been my best and most complimentary taste tester..Since day 1.~
‘Just a quick MOT, Margaret and then we’ll think about what to do.’
For anyone who has been living at the bottom of a hole for the last two years, The Help is a first novel by White American Kathryn Stockett, who was brought up in the South, largely by Black maids. It is set in the early '60s and features one brave young White woman who has lost contact with her Black maid in mysterious circumstances, which no-one will explain to her.
Miss Samantha Joelle Honey Lamb
taking, as you did, this world as it is not as I would have it;
Take Saturday’s match, for example.
Row 3-14- Repeat row 2
One aspect that could have improved this collection? It begins with many eloquent essays from catalogues of photographic exhibits. Yet, few photos are included. This forces a reader to rely more on Dyer's evident skill with words to tell us what is shown, but often, it's frustrating to have so few examples as illustrations. That being said, William Gedney's power as an artist leaps off the printed page, thanks to Dyer's verbal skill.
Now we come to the news of the moment. A Stryker Brigade is now to be deployed to Afghanistan, as the 3rd Brigade, 2nd Infantry Division, but with one very notable omission. It is not deploying its Strykers, which are now in use by the Alaska-based 1st Brigade, 25th Infantry Division, in a somewhat safer environment.
The male lead has wiped his memory *again*, and he's still getting chased by various Game people. Rockets rain down on trucks, tedious startup office humor is indulged in, and I damn near fell asleep from the boredom of it all. The whole movie was just an indulgent animation crew chasing its tail on the big screen. It wasn't offensive, but it also wasn't really a worthy use of an hour and a half of my time, or my money. What the hell, Production IG?
Special Downtown Brooklyn District and rezoning
Looking very good and taking first place in the Street FWD was Ken Suen in the Godspeed X Sportcar Motion Honda Civic Si with a time of 2:01.872. One of the great things about the Street Class is that you don’t need to have a full blown race car and big budget to get into time attack racing. Ken Suen and the Godspeed X Sportcar Motion Honda Civic Si did a great job showing what a popular street car can accomplish on the track and I look forward to seeing many more teams bring everyday street cars and begin their time attack careers in the Global Time Attack Street Class.
I’m happy to.
3recently purchased
The Bad
Rashun Dixon OAK I 20
“Did you have a blogger mom and a net savvy super cyber grandma, Nani?” My little one asked her.
Why did Israel expend so much money, time, and effort to develop the redundant Gospel Trail when the existing Jesus Trail already functioned well?
Why was Paul bringing this up 26 years after it had happened? This was the start of Israel’s demise. God began to set them aside for a season, and as we have just seen, for a reason. Nationally, Israel would have to wait until the fullness of the Gentiles be come in. Remember that verse in Romans 11:25? He writes to the Gentiles in Rome and says,
Cream butter and sugar. Add eggs and mix well to combine. Stir in the lime zest, cranberry sauce and dried cranberries then fold in the flour.
Tanner hunched over the wheel of the speeding HMMWV and flexed his shoulders as he fishtailed slightly around a tight corner in the gravel road. He had been driving hard, pushing the limits of the vehicle as well as his driving skills, for nearly two hours. The HMMWV regained traction and straightened out as Tanner tilted his head to the left and cracked his neck.
My experience of Druidry is that we tend to be pragmatic about pain. You won’t catch many druids seriously ascribing it to past life misbehaviour or ineffable plans. We can be collectively quite ruthless when it comes to looking for our own involvement in what happens to us. We tend not to blame the gods, but look at what we could have, or can do differently. The sphere of action is entirely human, even if we do seek advice and input from elsewhere. Druidry does not encourage people towards spiritual masochism, or to the willing acceptance of needless burdens of suffering. It does encourage us towards making the best of what we have, and doing what we can for ourselves, and reaching out to others for help, guidance and support when we need it. And to offer the same.
In one easy step the Capital Ambition guide to behaviour change takes us away from the original reasonable premise which was to cut waste across public bodies to myriad examples of top down directed, community initiatives requiring a plethora of publicly funded facilitators and coordinators.
Bake for 30-40 minutes until firm and cooked. Cool in the tin.
‘If worship is supposed to be unceasing, a way of life, then the weekly service is one of many occasions to worship. The Sunday service is special and significant, not because it’s our opportunity to worship, but because it is a joint celebration of the worship that has been going on all week long, an occasion to remember the reason for the work, and a time of preparation for the Monday-to-Saturday service in the week to come.’
*4 lrg eggs
I am at a very mythical place... Blue Moon Fiber Arts sock camp, also known as Camp Cattywampus. Mad, crazy things are happening here, and I am teaching classes on knitting with beads to the lovely campers here.
Here’s the site and NO I am NO part of it in ANY way, shape or form:
We all have the great opportunity to see endless amounts of art 24/7 online. I am tremendously lucky to also be able to see a wealth of art in person, in the museums, galleries, and auction houses in NYC. I never take this for granted.
Did you click that? Do, I'll wait. Are you smart enough for it? Cause I am not. I am an artist, an actor, a writer and I do.not.get.it. At the end of the day to me it's just a naked chick on a bicycle, and a woman wearing a dress that she can pee in sitting on a wooden chair for 15 hours a day being silent.
Of course people will have opinions on these three cricketers (and the agent who was the subject of the News of the World sting operation), and will air them privately to each other and may even broadcast them publicly via the internet. But they must express them in such a way that it cannot influence the outcome of a case which has yet to come to trial. The CPS is doing the right thing in setting this example. The ICC has done the right thing in responding accordingly.
But a poem should always be a beginning, never an end.
But no matter what I may think of the film, I can still post a couple of stills of Kate Upton in the offending outfit.
I always wonder.. how do other bloggers style the setting for photography.
Every relationship is different. Some men would never let a woman pay, while other men have a more modern view. Always be honest with your significant other about important issues such as finances, especially if you are unable to contribute much financially to a relationship.
and giving it your all.
1. Does your niche market have an identifiable need for your web offering? What is the gap or pain you’re filling?
Make a birthday card with winter theme.
So because in one poll Romney can’t beat Obama it’s over. Let’s ignore little things like the fact that in March of 2008 McCain was up by 6 against Obama and Kerry was up by 6 in March of 2004 …and those polls appeared so accurate in the end. Or let’s deal with the fact that they used an NBC/Marist poll (hint they’re almost always skewed to the left). What would happen if we actually looked at the latest round of, you know, consistently accurate polls. Let’s take a look at the RealClearPolitics list. How about the last 4 Gallup polls, two of Romney v. Obama are tied and one has Romney up by 4 and the most recent has Romney up by 2. Or maybe the last 5 Rasmussen polls, two of which have Romney and Obama tied and the other three Obama is up by only the margin of error. “No evidence whatsoever.”
Today was a good day. Thank You!
Recently I read about an interesting study, Positive Effects of Negative Publicity: Can Negative Reviews Increase Sales? Don’t get me wrong, I am not asking for someone to write a bad review. In fact, I’m hoping that doesn’t happen. I’m only saying the results of the study were intriguing.
Moo Moo Farm 1:17:751
I went home and told my mom what happened. With, I’m sure, the best of intentions, mom told me that the best thing to do would be to stay quiet and not fight back. She told me to never fight back, because that would just make the situation worse. I listened to my mom, and regret the next few years of “not fighting back”. More on that to come.
Meanwhile, talks in Copenhagen are hitting various sorts of predictable roadblocks:China and the United States were at an impasse on Monday at the United Nations climate change conference here over how compliance with any treaty could be monitored and verified.
“Hahahahaha… heh… oh, you’re serious? Yeah, I think it still has a phone feature on it. However, it only picks up reception if you stand on one foot, on a bridge, while holding tinfoil.”
Straight from TheRPGSite.com comes Mark "Mistwell" Cronan's old school homebrewed adventure module for 1e. Although it doesn't have a cover or even a title, I'm going to call it "Convocation of Death" because of room 11a, where it appears a Night Hag, a Mind Flayer, a Minotaur Lizard, a Hydra, a Gorgon, a Mimic, an Otyugh, an Ankheg, and an 11th-level Gypsy Cleric controlling two Clay Golems are having a meeting to figure out how to kill the PCs. Talk about a deathtrap!
That meant that I had a new toy. My little arms clutched tightly to his velvet texture and squeezed into his fluffy body with deep admiration. He was so soft and inviting, and I was never going to let him go.
Brgy. Ginebra Gin Kings (6-3)
"The most frequent question heard when I told friends I was moving to Singapore was “Isn’t that the place where you can’t chew gum?” It is true gum is not sold in Singapore. The ban on chewing gum actually had a logical beginning. Singapore invested a lot of money in a subway system and when it was newly opened a few doors were broken by wads of chewing gum. This happened once or twice which was a few times too many for the government.
250g feta
Still In Love With You - Thin Lizzy
slipping and falling back: It infects
The first of four 8.0 or greater earthquakes struck at 5:45 AM on Wednesday July 4, 2012. Like the Christmas day New Madrid earthquake of 1699 it occurred on a holiday. And like the four quakes of 1811-1812 they all happened within 9 weeks. The last two quakes occurred on Tuesday September 11h. The shortest duration of any of the four quakes was 2 minutes and 47 seconds. The longest was the first which lasted 3 minutes and 12 seconds. There were thousands of smaller after shocks. Two of the four quakes actually did reverse the flow of the Mississippi river just like 2 centuries before. As in the previous quakes, the hardest hit areas were Arkansas, Missouri, Tennessee and Illinois.
Geekyboy has splashed in the lake before, but this was his first formal class, poor neglected second child that he is. He wrapped his chubbly legs around my waist like a vice. "I no like the water, I no like swimming pool, its 'cary" he kept telling me. I agreed with him that indeed it was a bit scary, but that he was safe with mummy, and we joined the class, all dads except me! The first exercise is one where they teach them the skills to get themselves out of the pool. He mastered this and figured class was over, running away along the side. It took a little persuading to get him back in.
I’m watching my brother swagger through our New York City apartment…smiling. Rhys, the detached, surly man who turned brooding into an art form. But he’s not brooding now. No, he’s practically threatening to pistol whip me for shaking hands with the beautiful, half-dressed creature named Jane who just tried to sneak out of his bedroom. Weird. Brother Grim has a sex drive?
For me, I can always count on the support and encouragement of my family, and that is a true blessing indeed. They believe in me during those times when I don't believe in myself.
CUATSC: See You At The Senior Center
Okay, I finally figured out what I did wrong, so without further delay I'll return you to the previously scheduled programming. Reprogramming actually.
So even though I was concerned for him when I discovered he was not eating, I was not overly emotional about his having to stay at the vets. That is, until it was bed time. It was then we noticed that both Miss Abbey and Miss Myne seemed a bit lost. by 3 a.m. we were getting a clearer picture of the magnitude of the problem. Miss Myne and Miss Abbey would not settle down. In fact Miss Abbey roamed the house calling for him to no avail. As you might imagine there was no sleeping with all that going on.
So in the middle of realizing that school is really just a babysitting service, I became militant. I realized that public school is like Social Security. There is no money to do what we are pretending we are aiming to do. We should just grow up and admit that we cannot have effective public schools for everyone. Just like we cannot have Social Security for everyone.
Have a look if you have no plum tree if you can find some plums pretty cheapo in the supermarket. I never knew I had a plumtree till I saw some plums on the ground in the back of the garden last year- it had planted itself. Nature is fantastic sometimes. This recipe is pretty easy.Practically hands-free.
After reading far too many histories where the author makes sweeping claims as though stating facts instead of speculation, this was a nice breath of fresh air.
Kei Chi (Lycium Berries), 2 tablespoons
Quite how matters will be interpreted outside Ukraine remains to be seen. Anyone with any sense would not take any political point-scoring statements at face value.
up rearranging everything on the porch
I highly recommend this book
You're such a wonderful person
With a quick glance over his shoulder, he said, “We’ll see. I know your type, Camille. Our night together will be soon.” A grin curled his lips as he waited for a reaction.
Evelyn is calm for now.....to the internets!
I don’t need to imagine Marston’s bedroom practices. Though he encouraged wives to become “love leaders,” his own home operated on a different principle:
You may not know who David Kato Kisule is, I think you should.
Noble S, ALSPAC Study Team. Maternal employment and the initiation of breastfeeding. Acta Pediatrica 2001; 90: 423-428.
The survival strategy will be presented in Part 4.
And yet, while it would be great to see a quality licensed title today, there was a time when games were simpler, when good games were able to be made in 6 months to a year (or less), regardless of whether or not the subject was licensed property. It seems that there were more good licensed games back in the 90′s than there are nowadays, and most of them were games based on popular Disney movies/shows of the same time period. And despite the fact that Mickey had some great games of his own back in the day, this article will be focusing on Disney’s other cream-of-the-crop games, and it all starts with one of the best and most loved NES games…
In the end, the ngoko (‘now!’) chorus won the day.
But the lessons of our fathers
Light bodied--too light for a German pils. Nice and crisp, but a little more dull than a Czech Rebel. A little more watered down. Good beer for what it is, but not a great beer for the style.
It hurts me to scold you, to point out the wrongs you did. Oh how my heart bleeds. But somebody has to do it. Or else you'll end up being irresponsible adults in the future. Being responsible is one of the musts of living a meaningful life. Remember, each and everyone of us is placed on earth for a purpose. Says who? Says mom...and remember again, moms know things! They can feel things. They have an extra eye on the back of their heads (ah, you know it). You'll find the purpose of your life one day like I think I've found mine...that's the MAIN purpose. But apart from that, there is one common purpose we all are here- to love each other. Isn't it beautiful? Love heals dears. You better believe it. How, you'd ask. Because if you love, you are willing to understand why someone does something they do, and wouldn't get too upset for a long time even if what they do seem wrong. Especially when they do that to you.
* Detachable, showerproof hood
This quick and easy bar slice is a snack favorite in our household. These are egg free and freeze well also. They are great for those who want to embrace good health without costly expense.
Basho traveled to explore the present, the contemporary world, to meet new poets, and to compose linked verse together. Equally important, travel was a means of entering into the past, of meeting the spirits of the dead, of experiencing what his poetic and spiritual predecessors had experienced. In other words, there were two key axes: one horizontal, the present, the contemporary world; and the other vertical, leading back into the past, to history, to other poems. … Basho believed that the poet had to work along both axes. To work only in the present would result in poetry that was fleeting. To work just in the past, on the other hand, would be to fall out of touch with the fundamental nature of haikai, which was rooted in the everyday world. Haikai was, by definition, anti- traditional, anti-classical, anti-establishment, but that did not mean that it rejected the past. Rather, it depended upon the past and on earlier texts and associations for its richness.
10/13 Wichita, KS @ The Anchor
Good Morning, Midnight by Jean Rhys
“B” – A bid to practice existentialism; or, a panicked call for assistance about the bee on your forearm.
What does my future hold for me?
Dominique O'Shea Hillmen is a single mother with one goal: she must get over her fiancée. Following an author's advice to put down the cocktails and dive into her pain, Dominique finds herself sober in more ways than one. What she sees with some reflection is everything she hates: desperation, neediness and whew!– a big steaming hunk of arrogance.
By organizing and putting together vast amounts of knowledge – from archives, libraries, government records, company inventories, both offline and online markets, to the personal whereabouts of netizens, we seem to be seeing the Googlization of “everything.”
But, if we look at the record of what really happened, as it is in each of the Four Gospels, it was John who gave the people hope. The Pharisees had no message of hope for sinners, and the Sadducees had no message of hope at all, believing that there was no life beyond the grave (which is why the Sadducees were sad, you see). Furthermore, the Pharisees seemed to think of sin in terms of social class instead of in terms of one’s relation to God. But, of course, the most important line was that of the Lord Jesus Christ, when He said to the Pharisees that the tax collectors and prostitutes would enter the kingdom of God ahead of them, because the tax collectors and prostitues repented at the preaching of John. People came from miles around to confess their sins and to be baptized by him, with his baptism of repentance.
-that if the filter on a wet/dry vac is not first removed AND the reservoir is not first cleared of sheet rock junk, the machine begins to spew something akin to Portland cement
Finally, no harmony here, just a simple singer, Don Francisco, and simple lyrics. The selected photos are perfect. Make sure you’re volume is up. Prepare your heart for conviction.
Well I said we were hoping to get tickets to Bush Hall - and it didn't happen until the very last minute. Literally. I was bidding on a pair on Friday afternoon but was outbid by ... 50p. I was gutted. Really gutted. But later that night the seller emailed me and said he was selling his own pair of tickets, and would I like them. When we rang him he said he wasn't sure if he would sell them but he would let us know at 9am. 9am comes, he gives us the go ahead and I rush to pay for the tickets (the concert was on Monday!) Thankfully the tickets arrived two hours before we had to leave for Bush Hall...
Next, the ending. I can't talk too much about it without spoiling anything, but just know that I felt there were a lot of loose ends that weren't tied up. I don't mind when a book ends bittersweetly, but it kind of just...stopped. And left you wondering. In a bad way. Not something I care for, and if I had known it would have ended that way, I might have passed on it. Just not what I was in the mood for currently. But in the end I'm glad I read it because there were a lot of things I did like.
Some of the trails in rain forest
You will ride a bike.
B The Slide
And partially because I’m just annoyed.
It is funny as we have spent 2.5 years in the adoption process on courses, training and meetings and now we are matched it moves so quickly.... after speaking with the social worker we should be meeting her around 5th March!!!! woo hoo!!!!!
The patriotic theme continues and I can add another 80 flags to the tally. The big screen is accompanied by big sound, the volume booming out. We take it in turns to try and turn it down, with no success, but this soon becomes unnecessary as the rib rattling bass of a car stereo drowns out the pre match analysis. By half time the confidence is waning and the cries of "C'MON Aussies" are sounding increasingly desperate. The car stereo has stopped and we can now hear the commentators. They seem to have their Thesaurus out and are seeing how many variants on eviscerate they can use by full time.
Have you ever looked in your Stats for your blog to see what keyword searches people are running to see how they get to your blog and see something that scares the living hell out of you?
This semester has been really good actually. I think it has been the easiest i have had in a long time. I have had a total of five tests in the testing center the entire semester and I have three classes that do not have any tests at all. I think im living the dream right now. haha On monday wednesday, and friday i am done with class at 10 am so i go work out and then spend the rest of the day relaxing and doing homeowrk. I know im such a bum. I do not feel like going into details about this semester, so i will just share some pictures of what our semester consisted of.
Tiny Man....well he is just so much fun. I feel so bad for him because everyone just thinks of him as a handful or pain in the ass. He is so sweet though. He just wants to be engaged. All his bigger sisters do is yell at him and I admit that I get frustrated with him to because Momma just can't always keep up with him but I can't imagine my life without him.
Waiting for 3:30 so I can see him again.
I had these fabrics already all cut up into 6"x6" squares! Can someone tell me why they have been put away all these years!? I didn't have a rotatory cutter back then and used a scissor to cut them up at the time. It is fun to look at all these unevenly cut squares :)
3. Go home.
Also well-bred.
Preheat oven to 325°F (170° C).
Federal authorities, in accepting Kevin Mulcahy’s story as accurate, knowledge that its implications are deeply disturbing: Qaddafi obviously has utilized the materials and expertise of Wilson and Terpil in his support of such terrorist groups as the Palestine Liberation Organization, the Red Brigades of Italy, the Red Army of Japan, the Baader-Meinhof gang in Germany and the Irish Republican Army. He is suspected of having ordered the murder of at least 10 political enemies in Europe and the Middle East; two months ago, the F.B.I. arrested Eugene A. Tafoya of New Mexico, a former Green Beret, and accused him of an attempted assassination of a Libyan student at Colorado State University. The Libyan was one of a growing number outside the country who oppose Qaddafi’s rule. When arrested, Tafoya, who traveled to Libya three times last year, had Ed Wilson’s business card in his possession with telephone and telex listings in Tripoli, London and Washington for one of Wilson’s Swiss-based companies. Tafoya’s links to Wilson are still being investigated.
Using research to extrapolate this rate of membership and acceleration forward to the end of 2011 Q4, we will have 264, 627 dedicated whistle-blowers by January 1st 2013. So there.
On Friday we left Darwin and drove south. We went through the town of Humpty Doo and arrived at the Jumping Crocs Tour, which is located on the Adelaide River. We boarded a two-tiered tour boat and headed out, and just minutes later the first croc swam out to the boat. Wendy placed a piece of raw pork on a line attached to a pole and dropped it into the water from the upper deck. The croc came to investigate, and Wendy was able to entice the croc to jump up from the water for the meat.
As I've come to expect from Tardi, the art here was absolutely fantastic. From I've read elsewhere, Tardi wanted to emulate wood-cut style art in this, and used brushes and knife-like tools to score the background to achieve the wood-cut look. Whatever he did, it looks pretty amazing. The art has nice texture, and it looks wonderful. Tardi also draws some really cool steampunk creations that are sure to please the eye. There where many times when I would stop reading for a while just so I could just stare at the great art on the page. Tardi uses a lot of rounded and long vertical panels here which you don't see very often and give The Arctic Marauder a unique look.
Let's just get this out of the way, this is the best film screened at SXSW in years. I loved it from top to bottom and very much around the middle. I'm not a fan of metal, but now count myself among Anvil's fans. I don't care for their music at all, and yet I want them to succeed passionately and it is this portrait that has put me in their corner. It's funny, heartbreaking, transcendent; I left the theater with a song in my heart (not "Thumb Hang" or "March of the Crabs", but still).
"Be You" Chipboard Pieces by Fancy Pants Designs
He's going to get the next call out. My phone will be off.
Hospitals have come along way to allow women to be in control of their labor experience. You can have your midwife or your doula, your water birth, hypnobirth or birthing ball, you can squat on the floor if that's what gets you through. But they are there. For the unfortunate bad luck moments.
Mary is an orphan (there are far too many of them here) who was taken in by a woman in the neighborhood after her mother and father died. Senior James brought her to school at CH. She is compassionate and smart and hardworking.
I’ve just realised that when the weather forecast says that it will be “fine” it doesn’t mean what the rest of the world thinks it means.
Santorum: Republicans will have more money
Mayank said that Bhakti Mayank (ok later, the so referred woman) would be shifting to Hyderabad soon. Atul updated me on the recent happenings on mayank and said that he never expected Mayank would be married because of love. However, I certainly that doubt it would be Atul whose footwears were left for Mayank to wear.
## Checking for setuid/setgid programs.
Tales to Tug Your Heart
16 m
44. Jose Cuervo -- Shelly West
Yup, it's that tough. Despite the fact oral chemo or radiotherapy can be just as physically devastating as IV, one meant you got unconditional support, the other meant you had to attend work related interviews!! Yup, seriously. No, I'm not making it up.
What is Moses to put into the Ark? (Moses was to put the “Testimony” in the Ark. The Testimony will prove to be the tablets of stone (the Ten Commandments). The Book of Hebrews tells us that an urn of the manna was also placed in the Ark along with Aaron’s staff (which budded) (Hebrews 9:4).)
Jack only found dumpfnudel at a chain German bakery in a train station. The fast-food, chain bakery version did not quite resemble the homemade creamy-white buns. Instead the chain bakery’s version had a baked, slightly golden sheen surface. Maybe these grab-a-bite versions, were brushed with abit of sugar water or egg wash prior to baking.
each choice would represent to the ideal plan. The client can choose where to
The police chiefs, many he knew, were generally not interested in using those insights, he said.
A Cesarean birth hasn't been on my radar, so to hear that got my heart racing.
Which brings me to the really bad bit: the ending.
Barked Black Pudding.
Like 500 other photographers, I came to Houston not having a clue what would happen. I had been preparing for this incredible opportunity for months prior to my session, Session 3, March 26-29. There were four sessions in all, and believe it or not, I met a couple of photographers who had signed up for back-to-back sessions, 8 days of at least 4 portfolio reviews a day, and usually way more than that. I don't know how they did it. As much as I adored every single minute I was there, 4 days was all I could have managed. I was so geared up every night that it was hard to sleep. I was literally vibrating the entire four days.
Just a reminder: As part of Hambo's 10 Year Anniversary Celebration----they are running a free shipping promotion that runs until the end of the day today. Free shipping anywhere in the U.S. with a $10 minimum purchase. There is a discount on shipping for international orders as well.
A few months went by. More and more friends kept raving about their new "addiction." Clearly I was missing something. Not content to be a quitter, I tried again.
Although I am sad to leave family and friends, I am so excited about this new venture in mine and Michael's lives!
We have had this game for so long, as my great-grand parents are from Syria, so I assume that playing tabli was a common tradition in our family.
I am also watching movies from Roger Ebert‘s list of Great Movies, and I watched some good ones this month. They were: The Silence of the Lambs (which I have seen many, many times before and in fact own); Some Like It Hot; What Ever Happened to Baby Jane?; Night Moves; The Right Stuff; and Rear Window.
Perhaps it is depending on your perspective.
Here’s the salient point: like Solyndra, Enron was a favorite of environmentalists, and Enron was a huge backer of the Kyoto Protocol. A decade ago, people liked to talk about links between Enron’s chairman, Ken Lay, and President George W. Bush. But they leave out that the main thing Lay was urging on Bush was the ratification of the Kyoto Protocol. Enron probably would have fared much better under a Gore administration. Enron thought they’d make money on the trading operations from a cap and trade scheme. After Enron’s collapse, an internal memo from the late 1990s came to light that said Kyoto would “do more to promote Enron’s business than almost any other regulatory initiative outside of restructuring the energy and natural gas industries in Europe and the United States,” and concluded that Kyoto would be “good for Enron stock.”
I had hoped to be able to take pictures along the way, but I got so distracted as I worked that I forgot all about the camera. I'll definitely try to improve on that for future posts. Now, without further delay, I bring you my card, which I am dedicating to you, my followers, because I truly am thankful for you taking time out of your busy day to come and visit.
RCA—A make of electrical connector familiar with hold video and audio indicators. Might be called a phono connector or easy connector.
On the return ride to the caravan site I decided to change the route, getting away from the tarmac and gravel onto grass and mud bridleways. I left the hardpack and travelled about thirty feet before running out of momentum on the uneven mud, and falling sideways into a bush. I fell because I couldn’t release my SPD shoes from the pedals in time.
Sprinkle cinnamon on top and bake for 20 minutes. Remove from oven, stir and bake for an additional 20-25 minutes until top is golden brown.
In checking my teens’ accounts tonight, I can see that they both have a nice size balance on their cards. My son has off-campus privileges this year and has used his card to go out to lunch twice in the last couple months. My daughter used hers to buy a snack and a shirt while on a shopping trip to the mall with a friend. Mostly, they’re saving their money right now. And that’s okay by me!
Originally he was Eugene Vincent Craddock, a native of Norfolk, Virginia who didn't seem to like much beyond motorbikes and girls, and whose life was entirely unremarkable until the summer of 1955 when two events changed it forever. In July he was involved in a bike crash, one so bad that his left leg was almost severed below the knee. Then in September, with his whole leg in plaster, Gene went to see Elvis Presley play in Norfolk and had his mind blown. Elvis literally had his clothes torn off by rabid fans that night. Gene went home, picked up his guitar, and wrote Be Bop A Lula which he debuted at local radio station WCMS's talent show in January '56. By July it was a US Top Ten hit and Vincent was in demand, criss-crossing the States with his band the Blue Caps. His short life was suddenly mapped out for him.
I get back, "Tell me something hot!"
It was like a sucker punch, right in the middle of my office at work. I about started bawling. Holy effing shit I'm pregnant!!!!
Umm..what else. I had my eyes on Burberry and Prada flats too, then dogeared zodiac necklaces then some Roberto Coin items. Once I sees them all, then I can decide which one to cull. It's amazing what one hour on internet can do to you. I'm sure it's worse if I'm at the store. For now I only can browse from home.
- I need to work on my gun wielding skills.
"This is one race of people for whom psychoanalysis is of no use whatsoever."
That's where he lit up a joint and started playing Call of Duty...with a bunch of 8th graders, on line. I'm a bit of a cusser myself, but got super uncomfortable when he started to tell his teammates and opponents that he was going to fuck their mother's in the ass. You know, while I'm sitting there stunned. I pretty much excused myself and left him to play his game.
4. Donna, Donna
From chapter 2, “I want to assure you with all earnestness, that no writing is a waste of time, – no creative work where the feelings, the imagination, the intelligence must work. With every sentence you write, you have learned something. It has done you good. It has stretched your understanding. I know that. Even if I knew for certain that I would never have anything published again, and would never make another cent from it. I would still keep on writing.”
Line 3 – 3 syllables
She is a very smiley gleeful baby. A lot of the time. Ready to be happy. very easy to get her laughing. But spends most of her day irritable. At first, I put it down to her personality. I accepted her whatever she was like. At around 6-7mths of age I started to realise that it was likely due to lack of sleep. And as she has grown I have become convinced of it.
Ooohh, shiiit. It's that brainy fucker. Laurence? Fellopia? Jurgen? Owl? The fucker with all the SLIDES. The ENDLESS slides - shit, no, not NOW! I've got about a million emails to forward to my PA. Right - what can I do? Fuck. Er...clashed meeting? No - they just send you all the slides on Vimeo and expect you to watch it. Funeral? No - they come with you and tweet your grief. Er...walk out with an air of imperious preoccupation? No - they're waiting at your office when you get back there. They're like ZOMBIES. Fuck, there's only one way out of this: PUKE.
Your pants are obsolete.
As the accused successfully managed the litigation which he undertook to conduct there might at first view seem to be room for the contention that the complaining witness was not defrauded within the meaning of the provision of the Penal Code referred to above. But we believe that this position is not tenable. It would seem to be clear that one who, falsely representing his own qualifications, renders a service which the law expressly declares to be unlawful defrauds the person who in good faith reserves and pays for such services. In United States vs. Del Castillo (35 Phil. Rep., 413), this court held that a man who obtains the title deeds of another upon the false representation that he is qualified to represent him in litigation in a court of a justice of the peace is guilty of estafa.
He created diversity of our tongues and colors as a sign for those of us who are endowed with knowledge to recognize the wonders of creation. Divided into linguistic groups and unable to understand each other, each group spread out in the lands to set up their own communities.
God, in case you haven't worked out the pattern here, is going to kill you. By fire. Yep. "Burned with fire". He does it in Joshua. (God should totally direct movies).
I finally caught her and then got Derek out of the car. By this time, the workmen from the water lorry, which coincidently did not so much as have a friggin scratch on it had come out to investigate the "little bump" they'd felt and the subsequent noise.
Also, before you ask (because I know someone will), I'll tell you. That belly. Yes. It is killing me. My back. My feet. My neck.
So fuck you, weird, hairless, bipedal mammal. This shit is on you now.
Enjoy the pictures there will be more to come really soon.
The voice of the admondisher alternates between mockingly encouraging the protagonist through his ritual of shaving and encouraging him, or enticing him, into slashing his wrists. It could reasonably be concluded that this “bitter voice” neither wants him to go through with the act nor to refrain from it, but merely wishes to deride the protagonist’s emotional state. It is also worth noting at this juncture that there are a great many allusory references throughout the song which may well have a deeper meaner in the context of the poet’s personal life, but that the essayist is currently without access to a biography and can therefore draw no definite conclusions at this point.
I think I do know why Goldstein in particular is so reviled. He himself provides the answer here, writing about why the Left hates Israel and conservative blacks so much:
Definitely a warm fuzzy!!
SM: Not sure how to answer either question. I've been trying to "make it" for years now. By "make it" I mean get accepted by the establishment. This started back when I was in a band and we tried to get signed. Then I tried writing and selling screenplays. And now it's children's books. This is the first time where I feel like I really have a hit on my hands. We'll see, of course. But in the past people would say "oh that's nice" but I could tell they were just being polite. But people have gone out of their way to tell me how much they dig Mr Pants. We've even had people steal copies of the book off the print shop floor, which I see as a great compliment. After all, I couldn't give away copies of my CD.
Good version of an American Brown. Not a sexy style, but a solid beer.
"Was she abused? Was she held captive by some maniac?"
I believe we are all born with the capacity for gratitude, but many times we get in our own way. Two common examples of this are pessimism and perfectionism. Pessimists and perfectionists may have things to be grateful for in life, but they will rapidly find a reason why something is not right or perfect or how it could have been better. Their imaginal minds search for mistakes or flaws. In doing so, they immediately jump to the negative without enjoying even a brief moment of gratitude. “Yes, but . . .” is their language. They can’t enjoy a sandwich because it has too much mayonnaise or too little lettuce or the bread is too hard or too soft.
Get ready for the fireworks, folks. This is going to be magical.
Add the eggs one at the time, beating well after each one. Continue to beat the mixture until it all comes together and is a pale yellow.
There are plenty of reasons why people stay in a miserable marriage. They hope things will get better or stay for the kids. They are scared of what comes next. They think there will be a specific moment when they will know that they should leave. (Therapists say there isn’t.)
Based on a True Story & the Best-Selling Book
NAHB research indicates that gypsum drywall represent around 4.4% of the construction cost of an average new home, with material input typically represent 30% of the component cost (ie. gypsum drywall material cost around 1.3% of construction cost). If construction costs account for 52.9% of the house price, the current median sales price of a new home is $204,400, and points and interest on a loan, broker’s fees and return on equity add a further 16% to the final sales price of a home, then a 35% increase in gypsum drywall prices would increase the cost of new home by around $600. Based on income distribution and the minimum income needed to support the monthly mortgage payment (plus tax and insurance), analysis by NAHB indicates 246,000 U.S. households are priced out of the market for a median-priced new home when the price of the home is increased by $1,000. Thus, with the proposed increase in gypsum drywall prices, up to 143,000 U.S. households are likely to be priced-out of the market for a median-priced new home.
So this fortnight we invite you to...
Therefore, I am finally going back to school and starting college this fall, I’ve been accepted into all the colleges that I applied to and currently working on scholarships, financial aid, looking for an apartment (All the colleges are in a different city.) as well as getting to know two of my potential room-mates with my best friend who is also moving with me. Overwhelmed is the best word that describe me right now. For the overall experience I am beyond excited that I will be able to stretch my wings and see where I can fly to. But I’m also a bit scared seeing as I’ve always been a very sheltered child and don’t have the slightest clue on what I am doing.
Anyway, just take a seat and give this a listen.
plastic ice cube trays. Whether you like small or large ice cubes, your
1 factor
Thank you all for your wonderful comments on my blog the past couple of days. Aside from continuing to put together blog tour stuff, I've been spending most of the past couple of days writing Rising Book 2: Rebellion(which is the only other book in this series) and homeschooling and trying to keep up on housework.
This was on top of the $1.8 billion it netted from an earlier perpetual securities issue last month.
Their destination is a pound that can only be described as a concentration camp for dogs.
She won her case in the Western Cape High Court in Cape Town, but the Supreme Court of Appeal overturned it, on the grounds that Van Wyk was off duty.
In other news: Can we stop talking about the “new look” Miami Marlins? Simply changing your colors and admitting that you play in a city as well as a state doesn’t make you special. Especially when your new uniforms are ugly and your city has a 27 percent poverty rate.
Yes. Yes, I am...but not by the Urban Dictionary, whose definition says "A male who uses women for sex or other favors usually by charming the girl till they fall in love with them. A lot of guys do this in order to be a "playa" cuz in our modern society it is (by idiotic dickheads) "cool" and "hip" to be labeled as a "playa". A female version of this would be slut." Wait? What?!
30 Germania Street,
All of the ground-floor stripes are connected by a series of unique tables. The Dining Room table can be extended with a leaf, the Shaker Box tables can be raised or lowered, the Living Room table doubles as a chandelier and can be lowered from the ceiling. All of the tables can be joined together for huge dinners, or twice a year to form a catwalk that can connect to the stairway in the void for the fashion designer’s new collections.
To this end we are starting on the third and fourth supplements to the core rules. Have you ever wanted to take part in world building? Well now's your time to chime in and be heard. What would you like to see in Earthin? What would you like to see in Venus/Mercury. At this point I do have a strong idea of where I would like to go but the beautiful thing about fantasy and VSF is that it can be altered. If your idea is used you will be credited in the book.
The funny thing is, I discovered I could read the French in these journals with comparative ease, and I think I know why. The French here is of the formal style we learned at school, not French as it's spoken in the street today. It's no more that than our idiom is that of Jane Austin or Charles Dickens.
A simple minded appeal to the class warfare mob and the sort of people who still think President Obama is the smartest president ever.
3. Those stupid smokestacks If you can think of a better way to pay tribute to the hard-working steamboats of yore than launching fireworks out of a giant chimney every time Joey Votto hits a pop-fly home run, I’d like to hear it.
I set off for the Outback with a man and his goat in an old beat-up $400 Ford something-or-other.
bigRuby thinks our four-legged friends are not put on this earth to be poked and prodded for the vanity of the two-legged sort. We pledge to always do our best to bring you products produced without the use of unnecessary animal testing.
Canned potatoes are one of those things I never knew how to use until recently. Hubby grew up with a mother who used commercially canned potatoes in many of her dishes. I never liked the taste or texture, so I wasn't too excited to try it. Then last year my sister in law grew too many potatoes and wanted to can them up. I taught her how and she gave me a jar to say thank you. It sat on the shelf for quite a while, until I worked up the nerve to use them. To my surprise, they were actually quite good. The potatoes stay quite firm, you could never use them for mashed potatoes, but they're great for soups, stews and braises. I will still continue to use fresh potatoes whenever possible, but the canned aren't a terrible thing to have on hand.
Day 2: Drink fresh juice and add in the consumption of vegetables (mostly) and some fruits (if desired). If you are feeling a lack of protein, eat soybeans. Do not use any additives – no milk, no vinegar, no sugar, no dressings.
And if I was about to lose everything, if all hope was indeed lost, could I come up with a way to kill myself that would be relatively painless, but that would also do the job? I didn’t want to wind up a jibbering vegetable in some state nut ward somewhere.
I can’t describe my trip to Turkey in one post, so I’ll limit this to the basics: a crash course in traveling to Turkey.
It is easy to see when the powders are 'set' as they turn glossy.
You were brave enough to cheat and blame it on me
Her masochism is in fact how we’re introduced to her, an elaborate fantasy of her and her husband riding a carriage through the forest. Suddenly, her husband and the carriage drivers stop and abscond with her into the woods, where they tie her to a tree and whip her. When one of the drivers begins to force himself on her, Séverine responds with ecstatic squeals. This fantasy is intruded upon by her husband in real life, asking her what she’s thinking about as they climb into separate beds. “A dream of you and me in a carriage,” she says idly. “That one again?” In two lines, we know everything we need to know about their dynamic: Séverine has these kinds of extreme fantasies often, and her husband knows absolutely nothing about them.
Yoochun: That’s a good one!
Finesse in leadership offers people real hope that a lower card will eventually ‘take the trick.’
There’s a name for it on horses,
I wished Rene and I would have explored this subject and gotten help before we married. Before we had kids. I was a coward.
The church where I was pastor was in the Kensington neighborhood of Philadelphia. Our secretary’s name was Sandy. Young people from our church who lived in the area would often stop in and hang out at her office after school. One afternoon I went into Sandy’s office to use the copy machine and Luie, a high school student who attended our church, was there chatting with her.
Apparently anybody ‘can’ do my job. You don’t need any special qualifications to apply. You just have to keep your nose clean. Get to adulthood reasonably fit & healthy with no criminal record & stick an application in right? A couple of years spent as a probationer. Learning a few piles of books. Absorbing practices & procedures. Surely anyone can do that right?
Due to the physical proximity to Denmark of the now uncontrollable Malmö region of Sweden and the notable lack of Scandinavian solidarity on Muslim issues, Denmark closed its road and sea connections with Sweden. Militias and ex-navy elements stepped up patrols of the Danish coast near Malmö to prevent the possible infiltration into Denmark of radical Islamic elements in Sweden.
I haven't blogged in a while because I'm up to my neck in projects. And people just keep giving me more. One of these days I have to learn to say "no" sometimes.
I started being a trainee at SM during my first year of high school. As the news spread out in the school, when I was passing by in the hallway, they would look at me curiously or, ah right, they also came in my classroom to take a look. I always had a lively personality but because it made me a bit embarrassed, I just sat still.
Leaf was liberated on $76, 000 connection and is scheduled for making a primary court appearance Monday.
Bike infrastructure like we have never seen before. This bridge crosses the highway to connect to other paths and access points. Should I take some credit for this? Every time we see bicycle infrastructure in Germany and France we take pictures and send them to our mayor.
- I want to try hard to learn Japanese (had my first lesson on monday ♥)
Without missing a beat, I heard this gentle voice say "you don't need it all, only those things that are a perfect fit for YOU".
Well we made it through a year of breast feeding! And I've kinda been dragging my feet on weaning. Yesterday I decided to try skipping a feeding, only it didn't work out so smoothly. Apparently there was a clog, so when I had uncontrollable chills last night, I knew I had mastitis. It was four hours of chills, sweating, vomiting (only once, thank the Lord), head throbbing and achiness. I don't wish to repeat such an episode! It was AWFUL.
The ravens at the Tower are huge. There is the belief that if the ravens ever leave the tower then the monarchy will collapse. It appears that feeding them fresh meat, including the odd rabbit, isn't enough to ensure they stay. They also clip their wings so that they cant fly away. I also read that raven's mate for life. I always get a little kick out of animals that seem to fall in love and hang together forever.
I am going to work to spend less on Gas, utilities and products NOT made in the USA. (as best I can). I’m also going to carefully consider whom I choose to vote for in elections and make sure that their priority and loyalties are to the American working families.
Game Nutz Podcast Adventure 44 - E3 Roundup 2010
“You buggin. You just can’t roll.”
are damp and leave a cool imprint on the back
It was a very long, intricate night. I was in a 21st century British town in which, for a few days, everyone was dressed and behaved as if they were 18th century North American Colonials. Triangular hats. The whole caboodle.
There's nothing sexier than that special someone who'll whisper the week's hottest weekly supermarket deals in your ear. Here are the sweetest next-to-nothings we could find for Valentine's Day.
But learning how to do those things is just the bare bones beginning. I know that now.
For some, colored tights can be overwhelming, especially in a professional setting. I try to stick with muted, darker colors so that you don't feel like your legs could glow in the dark. My favorites are purple, maroon, navy, sage, and cerulean. I'd like to add a forest green in there and a rust red as well!
Do you ever wonder what your favorite designer's home looks like? We see them all the time on television or in magazines decorating other people's homes. What does her or his home look like? Do they do things to people's homes that they wouldn't do in their own.
The chilled spread of spinach and Spanish anchovies in a yoghurt/chilli powder dressing, believe it or not, was supposedly a two-dish of palak paneer and fish/vegetable curry! I’d decided to scrap the idea of preparing two dishes as it was laborious and of course, more expensive. I toyed with the idea of canapés for the spread as well, but ended up conveniently smacking a thick layer of the green paste on the sourdough. I thought the combination of savouriness of the anchovies, sourness of the yoghurt and tinge of heat from the chilli powder worked well with the bland, finely chopped spinach. The remaining spread was sandwiched between multi-grain toasts for breakfast on Monday.
Yesterday there was a big celebration in a park in Copenhagen. It’s the Fælledparken. On 1st of May there are thousands of people, several different stages. Every music lover will find something to listen to. It is very social and Danes seem to enjoy it.
During the song service, I realize I can use my camera to record sound, and possibly learn at least one of the techniques from a recording without having to bother Anna. Taking care to preserve her anonymity, I turn the camera face down and aim the lens at the pew in front of me, recording parts of two congregational songs. The video consists of only the seat of the pew. I’ve been recorded playing the keyboard/piano many, many times at other churches and didn’t think anything of it.
Please join us for food, wine and some intriguing works of art! 6:00-9:00pm. Saturday, May 14th
This is from a previously written scene. I just cut out everything in between the dialogue. It's a rough draft and unedited, so it still follows the rules. :) To play along, visit Write Anything's [Fiction] Friday.
Don’t use foul language
1 cup (packed) golden brown sugar
Who: Cathy and Dad
I have had my heart set on camping for a while now. As much as I love rain and I love to see things grow here in the Bluegrass, this is getting a little ridiculous! With camping out do to weather, Jeff and I set out for a different way to spend our day.
So, I got me down to the hardware store to get a couple of dowels for support as the thing dries.
We saw an epic battle between an underdog and a champion which seemed to last forever. The champ was battering the underdog to a bloody pulp. The underdog offering almost no reply or retaliation, somehow was managing to use their big thick skull to soak up all of the pressure. Now and again a few big blows would get through and inflict some damage.
The latter were instructed in the ways of Leninism, given fresh horses and sent against the British Dunsterforce on the Caspian. The former were drowned in buckets or something.
Frugal: We bought the house as an investment and have already increased the value by $60,000!
#6 1980 Jerry Bullitt EP Andress Shot Put 64'1/4"
Watching the young procession of mourners, as they stood in the salty spray beside the sea, I imaged myself from a distance, beside them, tossing roses for all our family members that have passed on.
In all big (Italian anyway) cities you get un-authorised street sellers, usually selling fake bags and purses on the curbside, but on this particular day they were all out in force flogging umbrellas, what a stroke of genius, after all who packs an umbrella when they're going to a country renowned for its warmth and sun? The moment we started up the street headed in the direction of the marina I stopped an umbrella hawker and bought one, didn't bargain with him, just unfurled the brolly and stood under its shelter as I handed over 10 euro. Simon was disgusted and scornful, declaring that I'd been ripped off. Maybe so, but at least Jas and I were dry. He borrowed 1 euro from me and declared he'd buy one for himself, sometime later he had to concede to paying 4 euro, which he gloated about but as he is, by profession, a salesman, it's a good job he was able to get a better price, I know who was drier though!
59. Hey, I’m writing a love letter to you, how exactly do you spell BEAUTIFUL? +
This is my grandpa and grandma. Recently I had a dream that my grandma passed away and I woke up crying. My husband did the sweetest thing and arranged for them to come to my birthday party so that I could spend some time with them. My grandma is starting to lose her memory a bit and really counts on grandpa to take care of her. She's always scanning the room looking for where grandpa is standing because as long as she knows where he is she feels safe. In my ignorance I thought that this might irritate my grandpa. I half expected him to meet her searching gaze with irritation but instead I saw more love in those eyes than I could ever find words for. This year they are married 68 years. He knows their time left together is short and he showers her with love. This is another couple that has faced great adversity in their lifetime and yet I have watched them STAND. When I was going through my own hard times 2 years ago I would think of my grandparents and all that they had been through and hold onto their example as I also was learning to stand.
It has been a very long time since I got to say this, Gibby suited up! Look at the Gibster:
"Around them, all was nervousness and elation. Lit up like stars, everybody loved everybody, and there was little shyness about saying so. Hugs and love and tearful embraces. It was all tremendously fluffy. These were children born to unions of a pragmatism so dry it chaffed, they came down from supper tables livid with silence, they came down from marriages where the L-word hadn't darkened the door in decades. There was the feeling of sweat from the nightclub cooling on the small of your back." (83)
most venal and rapacious type of creature imaginable. We have awakened
Wise friendships are a balanced combination of both a missionary and a mission field mentality. In a missionary relationship you are helping one another be the best you that you can be. In a mission field relationship you are trying to help the other person be the best they can be but their presence is a constant drain on you physically, intellectually, emotionally and spiritually. Be cautious of these relationships.
Here is my sister, Michelle, and me, in my blue blouse.
Salma Hayek got her start in a soap opera on Mexican television, but it wasn't until 1996 that she became a danger to the world. That was the year she appeared in "From Dusk to Dawn," as a vampire exotic dancer wearing a snake and a small bikini. That same year, the Lijiang earthquake in southwestern China killed 200 people and left 300,000 without homes; Seattle on the west coast of the United States was rocked by an earthquake; and the Kobe earthquake in souther Japan claimed the lives of over 6,000.
Not in the Tower of Song
We went to the local pet store (Co or Mart? You decide) with the intention of adopting a cat who was about the same age as Mr. Whiskers, but we found this grown-up guy, in the "full flower of his southern Metropolitan Xtian manhood,"* instead. Chez Bookhart in its entirety had squeezed into the tiny "visiting room," and the sheer brouhaha that we produced totally freaked out 2 other cats. Kirby, however, sauntered in like he owned the joint, and was unperturbed by the frantic attention of a 2 year old and slightly spastic 8 year old. He sat in my lap, started head-butting my hand immediately, and turned into a big soft gray pillow in my arms.
Dog: There’s something stuck on the roof of my mouth. I’ll just make this really loud slurping noise and see if I can dislodge it.
You know what I'm most interested in?
In the middle of Domino, Tony Scott’s fictionalization of the life of bounty hunter Domino Harvey, one particular scene pinpoints the film’s central problem. Domino (Keira Knightley) and her team (Mickey Rourke, Edgar Ramirez, and Riz Abbasi) have sat down with Domino’s mother and a team of television producers to discuss a reality T.V. show based on Domino’s life. The producer (Christopher Walken, phoning in the wacky yet again) is concerned that the footage they’ve gathered already is “too much like Cops,” and wants to lose the guys in favor of Domino’s sexy presence. Domino refuses – if she is going to do the show, everyone on her team will get equal coverage.
In the words of one whistleblower who revealed his identity, Steve Theodoropoulos, the investigation was a whitewash and nothing more than a review, not a true investigation:
How we break each other’s hearts
Whoa. Hold up! Re-eval. 32A is muy caliente. Man, I'm so off my game. How did I not notice this earlier? He mutters something about giving it a shot and turns on his iPhone. I think, Cute or not, if your phone causes us to crash, I will kill you dead.
Features full artwork with added Julian Cope autographs.
But I also had time to realize that putting words together is just a part of me- its something I do better than singing or cooking or cleaning...
"Leigh, it is a worthy exercise. I'd put the sarcasm away as well, if I were you."
Chitosan – A fiber derived from crustacean shells. Used as a lipid binder in diet products, in hair, oral and skin care products, antiperspirants, and deodorants. Alternatives: raspberries, yams, legumes, dried apricots, and many other fruits and vegetables.
Thank you so much for sharing with us Dabney! Now it's time for you to share your moodboard and win a fabulous monogrammed set of Dabney Lee At Home salt + pepper shakers. The deadline is this Friday, so go on, get started on creating something fabulous!
We also like to feature our girlfriends that have style so hot we want to hump it. Hence our feature “Style Humping”. Watch for it.
The highlights of this grim story remained Doyle's insights via Henry into the redirection of Irish possibilities as the postwar progress bloomed before stalling into junkies and violence with the Troubles, and then the "peace process" which had taken so much conniving and hatred to install.
Saturday: Sweet chilli sausages and chips
Long after they left it
Rules.
R5- ch1, (sc dec, sc in 2) 3 times, sc dec, join(10)
“Well, I guess you’re stuck with me as your taxi service this evening,” Travis said, rolling his head in Tess’ direction with one of the smiles that made her insides churn into a hot, molten mess.
I had been thinking about how to cover Amelie's school books for a while as I love the creative aspect of this (any excuse to get a bit crafty) and the novelty of covering school books for the first time. I was actually going to cover them in fabric after seeing these great posts from Cotton Kiwi and Ruby in the Dust.
When one thinks of cake, "refreshing" is probably not the first word that comes to mind. Usually, what makes cake, well, cake, a good drenching in buttery frosting, an uber-sweet filling, and a hefty sprinkling of something yummy, like toasted nuts. In fact, a mouth full of cake will most assuredly leave you reaching for a glass of milk…water...anything...to wash it down so you can clear your gob and go back for more.
1. Blitz the biscuits in a food processor until beginning to turn to crumbs,(alongwith some icing sugar and cashewnuts) then add the butter and whiz again to make the mixture clump.
Another way of seeing the two is the number of theatres screening the movies. Avatar has over 3,000 theatres domestically, while The Hurt Locker, well, you’re lucky to catch it before it disappears from its limited release. The DVD is out, so that really helps if you want to see it before the Awards night.
Together they come, and when one sits, alone with you at your board, remember that the other is asleep upon your bed.
It couldn't have come at a better time - we were in dire need of a few items, so while the Evil Genius ran wild in the neighborhood, Someone and I snagged Sprout and headed for the Evil Empire. We were really good, eschewing anything not on our list...until Someone walked down one isle looking for...something...and found the balls.
CFR Director David Rubenstein is a co-founder of the Carlyle Group,
That questioning, starting with unschooling, was a process that led me very organically to rethinking almost every aspect of life and how we live in this world. It was pretty mind-blowing. So as you can see, for me unschooling and anarchy have always been tied especially closely together!
I took to seeing galaxies on high,
I have mentioned this to Aliette before and it is a concern that still plagues me because I do write mostly in the context of my own culture: I don’t want to play tourist guide to the reader and yet I also want to write about what is most beautiful and most precious to me. And that is my culture.
Holding doors, letting people with just a few items go ahead of you at the store, gifting your friends with little somethings just because...it's a good feeling. I mentioned that due to our sick and wrong Totino's Pizza habit, we have a plethora of Red Box free movie codes. One of my new favorite things to do is carry a few extra with me and give one to people I see at a Red Box. I know it's only a buck, but people are always so shocked, and so thankful that it's worth ten times that to me.
Hippodrome de Vincennes.
I dressed to match the cool, wintery day.
The men are cuckolds and the women whores.
“Where are you going?”
*You will hop from one design team member's blog to another, collecting letters along the way.
“Danforth. Shoot him.”
Twenty-some years later and three days after moving to an apartment in a mountain town in Colorado, my grey tiger, Poopsue Purrington had 5 kittens. They were in a box of clothes way in the back of a storage room, so I couldn't see them. After a week or two I would reach way back in the piles of stuff and put my hand in the box and feel the soft little bundles.
Happy beading,
Challenge Yourself!
Catherine E. Chirls, 47, Princeton, N.J.
All these atrocities have occurred within the last 3 years, most within the the last seven months. And these accounts are not the beginning of the story, nor are they the end. All of these human rights abuses have been executed by private security forces that are hired by the MULTI-NATIONAL CORPORATIONS that come to Guatemala to extract the country’s many resources. The security forces are hired to remove indigenous peoples from their land in order to pave the way for the corporations to rape and pillage the land for their own economic gain. Their homes and fields are burned to the ground to prevent the indigenous people from trying return.
Room: 5
Living in a county that's bigger than most European nations, it's hard for me to understand why there is so much fighting over some seemingly useless bits of land. And the Israelis -- what on earth possessed you to agree to that whole "Gee, we'll give you back Israel" thing after World War II? I mean, I feel as bad about the Holocaust as any modern day Gentile-type-person can, I don't have any problem with Jews in general (unlike Mel Gibson, and hey, isn't "Mel" a Jewish sounding kind of name, anyway?). I know exactly one Jew, my childhood doctor, whom I thought was the greatest, and he survived the Holocaust and wrote 2 books about it, so shut yer yap.
The Peter B's actually were known as Peter B's Looners, and only recorded this 7" with more or less decent instrumentals on both sides. The most interesting thing about this record is the line-up: a still anonymous supergroup before anyone knew what might come. We have later Camel driver Peter Bardens, Mick Fleetwood, Dave Ambrose, who joined Brian Auger's Trinity soon after, and the first recorded guitar solo by Peter Green. +++
Faults: What do you like LEAST about yourself or your writing that you think you can say without sounding too pathetic?
Anna’s singing debut!
I’ve expressed before on this blog how when I am doing things like A Night AMOK, I feel like I am doing what I was created to do. It’s one of the most exhilarating things I’ve ever done. I described the feeling I get as I am doing these paintings as an almost child-like joy and that’s when it hit me. At 48 I am doing what I dreamed of doing as a small child.
Well, let's see. Sesame street is out, Yo Gabba Gabba is in. I wonder if I should get rid of the Elmo chair?
It isn't that I can't cook. I can throw together a few things. Nothing spectacular and probably nothing that I would ever feed people, but I get by.
11 Herman's Rocket - Indian Planete
If Goldman Sachs doesn't rule the world, at least the firm is doing a grand job of getting its alumni into places of influence, including the premierships of Greece and Italy and the head of the European Central Bank. (Via James Delingpole.)
Don't forget the Blog hop starts Friday right here!!
As the bus roared into action and the doors closed, I stood beside the headteacher, a man with a beautiful mind. He smiled at his pupils, willing them to have a good time. "She'll be fine," he said, his eyes fixed on the smiling faces that now greeted us. I nodded. "I'll see you on Friday," I said. How could I ever live without that child? She reminds me every day how rich and complete my life really is.
Thank you everyone for continuing to pray for Cameron and our family!
Since then, I've been coming out of it a bit. And with my Grandma's passing, we had an absolutely wonderful graveside service and funeral on Friday the 6th. It really was a celebration, and wonderful time to process, and be with each other. I was very much blessed and feel so thankful she is out of pain, has a resurrected body, and is with the Lord! I am at peace, because she is.
R59. White Opaque Pen. E25. 33. 31. 000. R20. And I edged around my puzzle piece with E71.
Tracy leaves a huge portion of the fish on the tail, which she can’t get off, but her portioning is good. Adrien finally cuts his fish, and while his portions aren’t as good as the other two cooks, he at least gets his filet in the pan before Tracy. They all make it to the judges’ table on time, though, and then comes the hard part.
TV GUIDE voted the show the #1 series of All-Time.
--The number of office space has been cut by more than two-thirds, and the original number of promised office jobs, 10,000, may be as few as 2,229, with fewer than 700 of them new.
~Louis Pasteur
I’m knocked back in.
We talked for a while, and I walked away with this on my mind:
James drops the mic, and walks away.
And how about our good friend Keynote? For those of you unfamiliar this is a the Apple version of Microsoft's mainstay PowerPoint. Not only can kids animate slides to show their thinking, they can share research, create persuasive writing presentations, and share results of a science lab. This app is especially interesting as you can add video to the slides. In the theme of revolutionizing, not just replacing old teaching/learning practices, students can now share a video of their results with classmates instead of just describing it on a sheet of notebook paper.
Montana - Pearl Size 6
4) Beauty:
Publisher: Kurodahan Press
By evening his tiny limbs ache, and he collapses into bed (a dirty, tattered floor mat) only to repeat the cycle the following day. This is his life. Khadim carries bricks—all day, every day. Summer does not alter his routine; it merely intensifies the miserable conditions of his slave labor.
Look at what love mislead hath wrought
Favorite Activities: I like to take walks and watch baseball.
“His zipper is down.” She whispered loudly.
Edit: Proof that you never know what is going to move you. Currently playing, Sonata in C Minor.
Anyways...
Here's the start of the announcement of the amended law in Publisher's Weekly (written by Karen Raugust who has done a terrific job of covering CPSIA book developments for PW):
In a revealing story in the Sunday Times two weeks ago, we discovered that not only had the police failed to fully investigate the girl being raped on two previous occasions but the mother was ridiculed and insulted each time she reported the attacks to the police.
Now Sam also walked with a cane, except most of the time it was never touching the sidewalk. Instead he used it to point at people.
Lately I’ve been getting a few “dating” emails, which are really just porn things, I guess. I don’t click on the links or spend a lot of time trying to figure out what it really is. What I find unusual is that instead of garbled English they’re written quite clearly, but they still don’t make a lot of sense.
I keep forgetting to mention this! If any fellow blogger out there in Blogland has a couple minutes to spare, go here and fill out this survey about mom bloggers. Bobbie Sue is trying to finish up her PhD and needs your help gathering information about how blogging might have helped you transition to motherhood. Please take a minute to help her out in her research.
Next order of business: I went to Nantes with Edouard, mon ami francais, for New Year's!! It was a blast. His family is so nice, and let me stay with them in their cute home. I was spoiled with delicious home cooked meals grâce à Ed's mom. She is Australian so we spoke English with each other, but I also spoke a lot of french. I can tell my speaking and comprehension is improving, albeit slowly.
So, here are my wishes:
We looked around. The place was small and lonely. No pictures hung on the walls, no care was paid to the kitchen, anonymous boxes erupted unnecessary contents in all the corners and Jeff stood dazed. He looked around and pointed out the things he needed to get rid of.
"I loved your book, It's Raining Cupcakes. I love all of the characters in the book and how you kept the story moving along so well. It is hard for me to pick, but I would have to say that Isabel is my favorite character. But I have to say that I was highly disappointed in the ending of the story. I wish you would have told us if Isabel won the baking contest." ~ Grace, 11
"several people are doing exactly the same as this. ALL are inspired by Captain Ranty
A Quilted Chain Bag from Chanel. It’s red. I brought it with me today too.
DURING MR. OBAMA’S CAMPAIGN IN 2008 AS THE DEMOCRAT PRESIDENTIAL NOMINEE ,HE USED TO REPEAT OVER AND OVER THAT HE,THE FAR LEFT ,THE LIBERALS ,THE DEMOCRATS,THE FANATICS WHO HATE AMERICA,THE UNEDUCATED,THE UN EXPERIENCED, THE ILLEGAL IMMIGRANTS, THE WELFARE RECIPIENTS, THE COLLEGE STUDENTS,THE ONES WHO FAVOR SOCIALISM,THE SENATORS WHO ARE COMMUNISTS,THAT THEY CAN’T TAKE FOUR MORE YEARS OF MR.GEORGE W. BUSH THE PRESIDENT OF OUR GREAT AMERICA THEN.MR. OBAMA WAS REFERRING TO MR.JOHN MACCAIN WHO WAS THE REPUBLICAN PRESIDENTIAL NOMINEE.FACTS MUST BE MENTIONED,ANY AMERICAN WHO HAD ENOUGH PATRIOTISM IN HIS BLOOD WOULD IF NOT ELECTED MR. OBAMA.
I just want to issue a special award to Hal Holbrook. Never mind that he's "Hal Holbrook" and an octogenarian and all that. He turns in a killer performance. Guy fucked me up even before the big farewell scene. One of those cameos that just raises the level of everything lucky enouch to be associated with it.
The days after that got better. Even when it was decided that Chase would have a ventriculoperitoneal shunt installed when he was nine days old. It was scary, but was a means to an end. It was what he needed to relieve the pressure in his brain. Although it wasn't fun to once again see our baby being wheeled into surgery, it was necessary and we finally got to take him home two days later. He has had a few surgeries since then, but our nurse was right. He is strong. He is healthy. Two years later he is walking and talking. In fact, he's just about running right now!
DO: Have a clear desk policy, even if it is not enforced in your company. We do handle confidential documents, so do make sure you lock everything away when you leave your desk for long periods of time.
As time went on; they learned more
Anyway, I found myself alone with a Mars bar the other night, staring at it and considering it’s aesthetic qualities. Now I have always considered a Mars bar a thing to be savoured; a rich and dense sweet confection. Surely a Mars bar is confectionary perfection. The perfect way to deliver sugar to the human body, in an efficient and attractive package. I have seen people devour a Mars bar apparently without proper consideration for its content or form! For me it requires a small considered bite, or cutting into small mouth-sized pieces, which are rolled around in the mouth. It is not to be eaten lightly, a real treat and indulgence.
- OSebai
Yes Galloway won due to a protest vote and unless the postal vote rules are tightened up, he might win again, but the main reason he won was due to the Muslim vote in Bradford West, not the "Asian" vote, lets not forget that.
Tonight Tom and I went to see the pre-screening of the movie October Baby. I wasn't exactly sure why I was going, because this screening was intended for pastors & leaders, people in the pro-life movement, or people who work as crisis pregnancy counselors. I left the pregnancy loss ministry behind at my old church more than three years ago, so I had no reason to go see this. But when I got the email from ARIN about it, and watched the trailer, I just felt like I needed to see it. I'm not sure where God is calling me, but He's had my attention lately, letting me know that something is coming.
not a single daffodil has bloomed in time
Chanted loudly, chanted lowly,
Some themes for money saving ideas that I have thought up are:
I loved fishing with my father, though the ocean makes for a hard life. Those three moons cause crazy tides and choppy water. I wish I could be happier in my marriage, of course, but I am content. My sons are all growing fast and show great promise, plus they get along well together. I have a few good friends. My neighbor at Vimar Keep, Lord Solomon Arthanis, is a good friend, but his daughters are terrors, so I admit I avoid visiting. My closest friends are my vassals -- the knights Brindor, Voor, and Victus, and also my captain of the guard Dalthis. We go hunting sometimes, and now that my son Miros is getting older we are even taking him with us.
A Vershire man has been accused of digging up his father's remains and bringing them home with him because he missed his late father.
What kind of support would have helped you most during your journey?
Letters containing a white powder that turned out to be cornstarch were sent to various New York banks and media outlets, and one was sent to Mayor Michael Bloomberg, reports the Associated Press.
5 finished
The IPKat notes that PIIPA describes itself as an international non-profit organization that makes intellectual property counsel available for developing countries and public interest organisations who seek to promote health, agriculture, biodiversity, science, culture, and the environment. The organisation apparently has three main activities: * expanding a worldwide network of IP professional volunteers (the IP Corps);
Always, always make sure you know who has the power.
We take advantage of the 12 days of Christmas!!!!
Should people be penalised for not touching in when there aren't any barriers or readily available swipe points? TfL said “The number of maximum fares incurred on National Rail is significantly higher than TfL services because a large number of stations do not have ticket barriers to act as a physical reminder to touch in and out. We continue to urge train operating companies to increase the number of barriers on their stations.”
"Did she just climax over chocolate cake"???!!!!!!!!!!!!!
it will always land on the buttered side.
It seems someone, somewhere got wind of the sting operation and stopped accessing the site via the IP address Mocality was targeting. Magdalinski then claims that the guilty party outsourced the operation to a company in India.
Just like a good peanut butter and jelly sandwich, there are times with two things fit together to create something wonderful. That's what happened with By the Light of the Silvery Moon.
Angina is treated with drug therapy and surgery. Drugs such as nitrates, beta-blockers, and calcium channel blockers relieve chest pain, but they cannot clear blocked arteries. In 2003, it was reported that administering testosterone to men with myocardial ischemia helped reduce the ischemia.
Choidon Daikaku summoned up 1,000 ninja warriors in the area to handle the matter. A bloody battle ensued.
Nope. We are left feeling appalled. The only question running through our weary mind, the only concern we really have is “Sweet Beezus! Is this thing over yet?”
Warm Weather...I was in the house cleaning during one warm day and Ky was mowing the lawn. Wy likes to help with all that so he was outside with him. Next thing I know, he is hurtling into the house insisting on strawberries in a bowl. I get them for him and he tells me, "I want to go sit outside and watch Dad mow." I knew it would be good. He ran out the back door, around the house, to the front of the house (I had the front door open but he still ran around the house), climbed into one of the chairs we have on the porch, and commenced eating his strawberries, and watching Dad mow the lawn.
Shi Kyung paid her back by laying some intel he acquired on her; the mysterious circumstances behind her mother’s death.
I'd have posted it sooner but Im still a little shy especially with vlogs
My road test is next week... (*gasp!*)
I plan for these puppies to be my primary European walking shoes, as I hear that flip flops are so passé over there. And I would hate to be a bad representation of America to our European friends.
Chopped carrots (optional)
Wikipedia says of The Maytals -
They will also, likely, talk a lot of golf and compare the latest research findings on which drug company reps give out the best / most freebies.
i believe that we will make it through our difficult time
don’t want to give away any spoilers, but I have to admit I have some love/hate feelings about Ellory and Adam’s relationship, and as a reader it was a rare experience for me that I wasn’t sure how I wanted the story to end. As the author, did you have the ending in mind when you began writing, or was it as much a surprise to you as to me?
Of course, I'd been one all along. Having an article published does not a writer make.
1 repeating
Drinking, drugging, in recovery.
Tues 23 October
Vice Admiral Ronald A. Route, USN (Ret.)
The characters of Enid and Kiernan were a blast to read as their fiery arguments kept each on their toes and thinking about each other. I liked also Dodd’s humor at the end as Enid will have the upper hand but will use it to maintain the new life she wants to lead.
But even more remarkable is the birkat hamazon (grace after meals prayer) that we recite after eating bread, and even more puzzling is the innocent and oblivious manner in which we recite the following
The "Play Time" title is cut at 3 1/4" from the Just a Note cartridge, and this is the cartridge I was most excited to start playing with. I think it's just adorable - and it also has THE cutest tri-fold cards on it - can't wait to try those out!! I like that the "Play Time" title has so many layers and a nice shadow - that really helped me tie in a lot of the colors from the layout. And of course I added a few buttons for a little extra cuteness.
Alex Boye is a personal friend of my son Matthew and his family. He sang at the funeral of my son Matthew. Was incredible.
“Themes from William Blake’s The Marriage of Heaven and Hell, released in 1998, was different from what Ulver had made before. Tore Ylwizaker, a new composer and sound architect, added to Garm’s expanding artistic visions, and together they stepped over the boundaries of black metal aesthetics, creating a genre-defying work. In this album, the musicians blended electronics, industrial music elements, progressive metal and avant-garde rock, adding ambient passages.”
Now, that's not to say that service is unimportant. Christ, as the mortal example of Goodness and Love, spent his life in the service of his fellow man. And I strongly believe that we are meant to do the same. Charity demonstrates our love for Jesus and shares His love with others. It strengthens our faith in Him. It demonstrates a willingness to submit to Him. It teaches us obedience. It helps to break selfish habits and patterns of thought. It is an essential part of Heavenly Father's plan to bring His children home.
Phil Klay loomed out of the pack. “Victoria! Awesome you came out!” And off, Helen and Mason shocked at his manifestation. The day felt like carnival, in the same way the revelers are as important as the masqueraders to the main event.
The king thanked him for the song, and gave him as song-reward a scarlet cloak lined with the costliest of furs, and golden-broidered down to the hem; and made him his man; and Gunnlaug was with him all the winter, and was well accounted of.
Our recent faculty achievements and publications in top ranked journals, by Prof Raju Mazumdar in finance area, Case publication of Prof Krishna in marketing, are testimony to the excellence that we pursue in business education.
Add a few good crackers (we like the Kashi multi-grain) and you have a great lunch with the added benefits of a lot of vitamin C and garlic for that nasty cold.
People build their arrogance from different foundations. Some start with money, others with intellect, education, lineage, job status, good looks, and athleticism. Some allow their arrogance to sprout from even the most obscure hobbies or traits. Arrogance can be based on real qualities or possessions: a genius IQ, a staggering bank account. It can just as easily be based on illusion: a ‘brilliant’ strategist who gleans every last idea from others, a ‘millionaire’ who owns nothing more than a generous line of credit. It can be rooted in the past: an out-of-shape, fast-food addict with a glorious, football youth.
Notice I didn’t say “make time.” We’ve all got the same twenty-four hours in the day (at least here on Earth that’s true — you fantasy and sci-fi writers, modify to suit your particular planetary rotation), so there’s no way to make the day magically longer. However, we can structure our days to include a few hours, or even just a few minutes, to work on our stories.
There’s enough soil now to fill the rest of that raised bed and get started on some planting, but still a huge amount to move and lots of clearing up to do. For now, though, I think a hot shower and a bowl of soup are in order.
Emotional Detox? Right now I am just elated with all the support.
Neuhard was named Michigan Lawyers Weekly’s 2009 Lawyer of the Year.
Tiny Wonders
Accessories: Markers (Copic), Butterfly push pin (Webster's Pages), Seam binding, Pearl brad, Glitter, Foam tape, Thread, Sewing machine.
3.What’s with Bruce Wayne’s facial hair?
Any of our blog entries that criticizes a public figure, corporation, faulty product, or advises our readers against something deemed to be harmful, is automatically filtered out and buried by the Internet mafia’s search engines.
‘How long will he live?’
If your book’s web site, blog, Twitter, and Facebook Page drive traffic to your Amazon book page, then tracking your sales rank history via NovelRank is a great way to determine if and when your online marketing tactics are effective. It’s also a convenient way to compare your book’s sales rank with competing books.
Toshiba Satellite L645D-Buy The Toshiba Satellite L645D-S4036 LED TruBrite 14 Inch Laptop On Sale
The Russians believe that Georgia would cooperate with the United States in blocking any supplies from reaching Military Base 102, which now is supplied primarily by air. Right now, Georgia blocks the only land transportation route through which Russian military supplies could travel.
Act : Belsavis – World Pvp – Republic Level 41-44 – Empire Level 41-44
E-book, e-book publishing, create ebook,
Since You Went Away ... TCM ... 5 PM
Me either.
I've thought about submitting it to the
P.S. I thought she was head down, but then realized she was still transverse. Although since then, I think she might be head down again. I'm kind of stressed that she'll be transverse when it's time to deliver her, since I really, really don't want a c-section.
I am so nervous. I really hope they choose me.
These days, you can get cookie cutters in about every shape imaginable. What you dont find in the stores, you can order online.... perfect for any celebration.
A more common approach (which I do also applaud) was represented by Gilt, Barneys and Bergdorf Goodman. They offered the suite of social sharing options (Pinterest, Twitter, Facebook) in a visible way. Even if many people utilize the “Pin It” bookmarklet, having these buttons on their sites are a visual reminder of the various platforms where people want to place this content.
Some have bemoaned this development, as evidenced by both Fox News and MSNBC's negative reaction to Colbert's testimony. Both shamed the appearance as detrimental to the integrity of the instituion. But I have to wonder if Colbert's testimony, especially his final exchange with Congresswoman Chu, was really worse than condemning immigration reform to superficial lip service. For that matter, it is hard to argue that Lady Gaga's remarks--and her tendency to scream them into the microphone--were really more crass than representatives enabling homophobia by upholding the Don't-Ask-Don't-Tell policy.
Saturday I still had a migraine and no energy, but I managed to mow the flat fenced in part of the yard. Did around 12 loads of laundry(which I will admit I have not folded yet :/ ) The kids chose that day of course to be obtuse and not want to do what Mommy told them to. So, to help them feel better and make my job a bit easier we decided to have popcorn and watch a movie before bed. I ended up choosing a movie for them because they couldn't all agree.
He is much happier climbing up the slide. Its perfect for him and for me. He can climb to his hearts content and I don’t have to worry because the slide “catches” him when he falls. And then he can go again. Its very self sustaining entertainment.
Berkeley's working relationship with Judy Garland was unraveling as well. This was the fifth movie he directed her in -- there had been For Me and My Gal ('42) in addition to the three with Rooney -- and under his martinet bullying her attitude had gone from "I don't know what I'd do without him" (on For Me and My Gal) to "I used to feel he had a big black bullwhip and was lashing me with it" (in conversation with Hedda Hopper, reported in Hopper's autobiography). Judy was close to hysterics on the set of "I Got Rhythm", her nervousness heightened by a stunt Berkeley designed in which she and Mickey were hoisted aloft by the ankles. The bit terrified Judy, just as a similar hoisting had when Berkeley put her through it in the "Minnie from Trinidad" number in Ziegfeld Girl ('40) -- this time, making things worse for her, the bit was accompanied by dozens of pistols firing over and over again around her. After "I Got Rhythm" was in the can, Judy's personal physician ordered her not to dance for three weeks.
About suffering they were never wrong, The Old Masters…
This also creates a situation of two habits reinforcing each other. Writing down all of your good decisions makes you feel good, which subsequently makes you want to make good decisions the next day so you can write them down. It's a cycle of positive reinforcement. This leads me to step 6:
One of my favorite stories comes from Rome, where I met a funny old man on the main road leading into the Vatican. I had wandered away from the group to explore the trinkets for sale in various kiosks and to take in the surrounding architecture without an annoying tour guide babbling in my ear. A cart selling “silver” charms caught my eye, so I walked over and marveled at all the beautiful baubles.
And this simple distinction between erotica and porn is just exactly like that. Erotica writers believe they have in fact done this, when they have not.
For hours, they played like children in the playground. They climbed the monkey bars with acrobatic ease, slid down the slide, walked the seesaw as if it were a tightrope, but failed to move the merry-go-round. After talking about stars until the sun came up, they tried once more. They looked at each other differently. Chris saw what she had seen in the girl’s house, and he cried for the first time in a long time. Then they tried again at the merry-go-round and did not feel bad about giving up.
Mack
Eldred is hitting .385 with 12 home runs, nine doubles and a triple in 78 at bats through the early portion of Toledo's game today. His OPS is over 1.400. It's not like the Tigers have exactly been raking lately as a whole, or have a clear-cut, every day DH. I don't know what the issues would be with the 40-man roster (somebody would have to be removed), but usually, it can manuevered. Why wouldn't it be worth a try?
I Hope all your Christmases were wonderful. Any New Year's Eve plans?
were a blast to work with.
(7)Occupation:
We will miss the quirky, grumpy, chatty, bossy, loveable Derby Stores and the butchers and the fish and chip van on a Tuesday night. We will miss Lammas Land and the walk across the little oasis of feral fenland to the centre of town. We will miss the amazing variety of birdlife we managed to attract into our tiny garden and the easy access out on to Grantchester Meadows.
He lived in a seedy neighborhood in Kansas City. When the night freight passed, the windows rattled in their frames and the dog in the flat below barked like a maniac.
Steak slice - soft, elastic-like pastry that holds boiling hot Bovril
Yep, waterslide decal paper is a truly fab product, though as great as it is, there is one major drawback - it is not particularly durable.
Mike: No, he’s an actor, not a basketball player
Later the European traders introduced the glass materials which became a huge hit everywhere.
“I have to go now, Scotty. But only use this thing in an emer- gency, okay? It’s annoying.”
WWS is cruising along and my small class is on week #17.
There is so much cardigan that my $1 purchase fills a grocery bag on it's own. Over two sunny afternoons in the back garden, fending off the playful cat, I unravel the lovingly hand knitted grandpa cardigan. It has several tidily done repairs, and has even been taken in at some stage. I fantasise about who knitted it, and who wore it, and how many episodes of Coronation Street it took to complete.
I remember the main theme of the retreat was on pressure points. Well, at least one of the themes (I’m assuming there was more than one, so I’m also assuming I forgot the others…). We often split into small groups and shared a type of flashcard that was made to study pressure points. It would have the location of the pressure point on the body, as well as its purpose and other useful information. Those first frustrating attempts made me realize how difficult it is to successfully use a pressure point against an enemy. Skimming through all of the cards in our pile also opened my eyes to how many pressure points there were in our bodies, which was stunning. Supplemented with pressure point training from our last retreat (as well as random classes every now and then) has helped to pique my interest. One day I plan to take a more extensive look at the packet of pressure point locations I received at the most recent retreat so that I can truly understand it.
I can also exclusively reveal the forthcoming Magic Rock TV advert:
Finally, we come to the end of yet another exhaustive awards season. Though not as infuriating as the one of last year (in which The King’s Speech ended up stealing momentum from the far-superior The Social Network), there’s still stuff that will get people angry (little to none recognition for Drive and Shame? C’mon) and stuff that will make people overjoyed (The Girl With the Dragon Tattoo winning Editing last night was a high point of the ceremony for me), but awards seasons always end up feeling tiresome, and yet I always watch them every step of the way and once they’re over I vow never to follow one as closely ever again, even though I know I’m full of it.
My second thought: I know emails get lost, but I don't typically do the losing. I answer hundreds of emails a day. And I read them all and consider them all. (Unrelated: for this reason, I hate when queries say PLEASE READ or something similar in the subject line.)
And of course this crap from Andrea Mitchell – and pretty much most of her fellow commisar comrades – just goes on non-stop. Not even a full week ago Bill O’Reilly was exposing Andrea Mitchell as a biased left-wing hack propagandist masquerading as a “journalist”:
For his cover the singer is sat staring with a serious face that relates to the title of the track. As to no clue what the single is about it, seems that there are feelings portrayed for someone that is elsewhere and not able to reach out to them.
JER 17:7 “But blessed is the man who trusts in the LORD,
Not wanting,
been living for six weeks now in kerry + i still have yet to find out how it got baptised as ‘the kingdom’. kerry had always been my favourite destination in ireland. it just never occurred to me that i’d live here one day and for the record, i am already in love with this county!
Pour into tin (I used a small loaf tin).
*November 18-19, 2011
So the clown stalked her discreetly for the next few days, and eventually caught her off guard when she was bending over to pick up her lucky alligator’s tooth. He promptly buried his nose between her arse cheeks, causing her to squawk like a parrot and belly-dive onto the ground. Honour was satisfied and they became the best of friends.
it could be due to writer’s block,
This report also notes that commercial nuclear power spent fuel currently exceeds 30,000 MT … “about ten times the mass stored by the Energy Department.” (pg. 26) For further discussion of the topic of missing military spent fuel, please refer to Plutonium, the First Fifty Years reviewed in this section of RADNET.
The true story of this abandoned building is even more colorful. In the early 1980's, it housed a Jewish synagogue on the ground floor and artist studios on the upper floors. "The rabbi was the landlord," said Ron Rocco, an artist who first leased a studio space in the building in 1984. Rocco recalled seeing huge matzo ovens in the back of the building and, in the basement below the synagogue, handmade mikvehs - the ritual baths used to purify members of the Hasidic community.
"Do you believe he really will come back one day and take care of you?" we asked the sixty-five year old spry and energetic grandfather. "Yes," was his reply.
But over the last three years, the tide has turned. We broke the Taliban’s momentum. We’ve built strong Afghan Security Forces. We devastated al Qaeda’s leadership, taking out over 20 of their top 30 leaders. And one year ago, from a base here in Afghanistan, our troops launched the operation that killed Osama bin Laden. The goal that I set – to defeat al Qaeda, and deny it a chance to rebuild – is within reach.
We're in Autumn.
Nope...what I did this morning was push myself.
However, another politician is working in the opposite direction of Gillibrand. Wisconsin Gov. Scott Walker, repealed a law in his state recently which gave people legal recourse if they had been victims of wage discrimination, Wisconsin’s Fair Pay Act. Walker is up for recall election this summer and his opponents as well as many other politicians in the state are calling this repeal an attack on women and equality.
The recent flurry of news stories involving inmates claiming innocence but accepting guilty pleas in exchange for release from prison warrants some discussion. The particular plea bargain is known as an “Alford plea” and originated in the United States Supreme Court case of North Carolina v. Alford in 1970. The Supreme Court upheld the plea agreement entered by the trial court, despite defendant’s protests of innocence, and determined that since defendant was adequately advised of the plea arrangement by his lawyer and entered the plea voluntary, the plea bargain would stand. The underlying facts of the case are relevant to this discussion.
Overall I'm just pretty excited. I'd been saving my money for a new dining set and this came along at the right time. We needed to clean out Dirk's grandmother's house and no one else in the family had a use for this. And did you know, it's actually not that expensive to have furniture re-upholstered? I looked at new dining sets for a couple years, waiting for the "right" one and I was going to spend at least $1000 for something, more if I want it to be nice. I'm getting these chairs redone for much less than that!
With a sardonic smile, Megyn stammered, “I think, just FYI, I think, I think Jon Stewart needs to go back to your class and needs a refresher on how to do comedy, on how to do comedy–as opposed to being mean and unfair.”
Thanks so much to all of you who shared your WONDERFUL cards and projects with us here for our digi team's Things with Wings challenge.
1 unicorn
It dawned on me after I realized that I had missed the ball drop, the kiss, the excitement of the New Year that I am so happy to be where I am in my life. I certainly enjoyed my single and even married but without kids years, but I don't miss the constant feeling of being let down after setting such high expectations for holidays like New Years in particular. It was a great feeling to know that I am so content where I am in my life right now. I am blessed with an incredible and loving husband, a hilarious and tender hearted little boy, wonderful friends and supportive neighbors. Who could ask for more?
“Gender nonconformity” used to be considered a negative trait, something, which if found, provided an argument against same sex parenting. But listen to Stacey and Biblarz turn “gender flexibility” into a positive trait.
I love the colours on this, the papers are scrummy! the image I coloured with markers and a black polychromos pencil and a little white pen. I havent used that pen until this past week or so, my daughter had nabbed it and not told me! surprise!. The ribbon and pearls from my stash, the sentiment is SU. I did add a little glamour dust to the sand but it doesnt show so well.
I had to resort to searching for and deleting anything with 'avg' in the title. This probably means lots of vestigial orphans clogging up my memory and that I've deleted the pictures of Auntie Vera's Garden. But the joy of success was almost worth the angst. My prodigal PC and I are friends again.
craving bad cravy things
Shortly after I originally posted this piece, a contributor who preferred to remain anonymous--Heaven knows why--wrote me an email regarding Doug Moench, who wrote World's Finest #289, but is probably much better known for two-fisted action stories like his long, early-90s run on the Batman titles with Kelley Jones:
ST vol 8 The Great Outdoors
Dear Driver in the green mini-van,
Also, please understand that I am not giving a blanket approval of direct action, which can range from trespass and simple vandalism through to the extensive destruction of property, and which in many cases is unjustifiable (e.g., “Black Bloc” vandalism at institutional meeting protests). However, direct action is used legitimately and with effect in many struggles around the world. For example, villagers in rural areas regularly protest unwanted developments by destroying the equipment and vehicles of the developers, of such things as garbage dumps, polluting mines, and dams. It happens, and the villagers, who often number in the thousands, feel completely justified in their actions. To them, it is a matter of self-defense.
I run a small wargaming company (Black Hat Miniatures) and was also working one day a week as an IT consultant (which was my original career). When the IT Consultancy finished I looked around to see what else I could do to make some money and realized that it was now possible to self-publish on the Kindle. So my initial prompt into self-publishing was to explore the possibilities of making some extra income from writing.
Kerri: I want something, but I don't know what I want.
Scottish athletes such as the cyclist Sir Chris Hoy are senior members of Team GB at London 2012 and are expected to lead the charge for gold medals. Sir Chris Hoy has described himself as ‘a Scottish athlete in a British team’ and Glasgow will even host eight Olympic football matches at the city’s Hampden Park stadium.
I won’t lie to you. The girls who just want to have fun dug deep. Way deep. We’re Nancy Drew times three. There were times when Ella’s dialogue would be: “stalker much?” towards Jess and then to me: “you ruthless predator!” when my detective prowess reached heights. Ha-ha!
So to use Britain as an example, even though its fleet of 1914 was in an absolute sense, far more powerful than it’s 1904 fleet. The various lesser powers (U.S., Germany, Japan primarily) had caught up with it in the technical race. Britain ran hard, but still lost the race. In the end Britain was forced to pull its Pacific fleet to face off against the improved German forces. This ceded the Western Pacific to Britain's then ally, Japan. As we know, even close allies don't always stay friendly.
Complaints flooded in that schoolgirl Miss Watters had no right to the crown because she did not even have the naturally-fuzzy Fijiian hairstyle
I end up reading random pages – and then find that I have somehow ended up with a cup of tea. And I am lounging on my sofa. Or my bed. Or just on the floor. How on earth did I wander away from the shelf cleaning exercise?
Rhetorical Analysis:
How about the rest of the chapters? Well, I am not that worried about Chapter 1 'cos I think I can write it up in a week (I'm puffing hot air). It's Chapter 2 I'm worried about. Paraphrasing tons of literature is a daunting task and I hate having to remember the rules that go with it. My game plan is to consume an enormous amount of caffeine for a week and write the Lit Review as if my life depended on it. Pretty ambitious eh? If I can pull this off and tidy up the rest of the chapters, I can potentially submit my thesis in April!! You know, the moment I finished typing that, I asked myself "What? You seriously think that's possible?". Not even the voice in my head is convinced. Sometimes I wish she'd shut up.
“If you support someone just because they’re a woman, and the National Organization for Women supports anybody whose a woman,then you’re saying we’re just supporting them because they’re a woman, and you’re not being discerning at all. So you can’t have it both ways.”
‘Mao,’ I’m told. ‘No,’ like the mayo in mayonnaise.
If VB started walking around, grinning like an idiot, which is apparently the only thing that will satisfy some people, will they then have nothing to write about at the DM or will the next never ending fixation be about her teeth or how big she smiles ?
The fact is, friends, we’re facing a challenge in America today that’s going to require a good dose of courageous stick-to-itiveness. That challenge is defending religious liberty. Chuck made it very clear in his final months and days — and I agree with him — religious liberty is under assault in America today like never before.
Proceed to grocery store to spend over $100 on mostly ingredients to make dessert.
I understand that you weren’t working with much. Even in the 17th century, this was not the face of a handsome man. The whole John Rolfe thing makes way more sense now. But still, you turned Jeremy Irons into a lion. You could have at least given John Smith a beard.
What about that pitchfork-like utensil at the left, hey? Maybe I had more of the devil in me in my college days.
I remember, as a child, seeing someone on television crying, and I couldn't figure out why. Everything about the circumstances seemed festive, positive. It might even have been Miss America accepting her crown.
Georgia has an appointment tomorrow for IV meds and a quick visit with Dr. Neff. He's almost fully recovered from his back surgery, and we're glad that he's back in the office, telling corny jokes and talking in crazy accents. But no monkey walking - yet. : )
Joined in the cleanup by his brother Yngve, a graphic designer whose control only serves to heighten the manner in which Karl Ove has been sideswiped by his father's death, we watch Knausgaard stumble through the filth and detritus, weeping uncontrollably, trying to piece together exactly what had happened in the years of his father's self-imposed exile. One extraordinary realisation is that his father had actually spoken of suicide several times; his belief that statistics didn't show that many car accidents with single drivers were deliberate attempts to end a life, his thoughts on the various methods; but all of this had seemed nothing more than a topic of conversation, Knausgaard unable to see it as anything else, his father having imprinted his image of himself so clearly in Karl Ove's mind that he was 'always engaging with the person he had been' rather than the one he had become. On of the lowest points is related by his Uncle Gunnar who tells both boys about the time when their father had broken his leg but remained lying on the living room floor, attended by his mother, rather than calling a doctor.
The Sudcrawler moves slowly down a great sand dune.
The Saint Martin Noel, tasted in a dark and cozy bar in down town Brussels surrounded by tourists! Brewed by Brasserie de Brunehaut, the Saint Martin Cuvee de Noel is one of those beers that simply knocks you out without you realizing it.
Lemon curd always makes me think of my mom. Mom loves lemon anything so lemon meringue pie showed up often when I was growing up. I do have her recipe and I know it is good but it uses cornstarch as a thickener along with egg yolks and water (that's right water, I had to do a double take the first time she gave me this recipe). No disrespect mom but I wanted to keep my recipe simple and focused on two techniques: mixing the eggs and sugar with a whisk or mixer until well blended and the cooking method. There are many recipes for making fruit curds. Some use yolks only or other additional thickeners or less butter or the addition of salt or more sugar and on and on (and water?!). I am not saying anyone of these recipes is wrong or right because as long as they work, that is right!
Durkee French Fried Onion Rings
Apart from occasional excursions in England and Wales, Edward Donovan (1768–1837) never left London.
Three stories that have appeared for the first time in book form in Speculative Japan that really jumped out at me were Kajio Shinji’s “Reiko’s Universe Box,” Kawakami Hiromi’s “Mogera Wogura,” and Yoshimasu Gōzō’s “Adrenalin.” In “Reiko’s Universe Box,” a young woman copes with her negligent husband and failing marriage by becoming absorbed in a box containing an entire galaxy in miniature form. Like many of the stories in this collection, “Reiko’s Universe Box” is driven by strong elements of allegory, but its concept is delivered with cleverness, darkness, vivid description, and humor. When compared to the other stories in the collection, Kawakami’s “Mogera Wogura,” a description of a day in the life of a mole-like creature who lives among humans in contemporary Japan, is in a class of its own in terms of its gentle magical realism, its playfulness, and its removal from the themes and narrative style of more traditional science fiction and fantasy. “Adrenalin” is not a story but rather an abstract poem filled with evocative imagery conveyed through variations of a handful of short and catchy refrains, such as “To you, children of spirits, I send an immediate telegram / To drink milk / To memorize the names of flowers / Some day, I will return / That day, I will start fire.” I’m usually not a fan of Japanese poetry in translation, but I found myself captured and moved by Marilyn Mei-Ling Chin’s translation of Yoshimasu Gōzō’s verse. Each of these three selections stands on its own not simply as an illustration of a speculative concept but as a piece of writing that is fun to read, thought-provoking, and capable of multiple interpretations.
His neighbours moved; at last, he was alone.
Rumor: Apple iPad mini to launch in October – A new report claims Apple is preparing to launch an 8GB iPad “mini” this October for less than $250.
My favourite London underground station, if anyone can have such a thing, is Westminster station. As you leave the station and climb the few steps to exit the station there facing you is the full majesty of our sovereign Houses of Parliament with St Stephens Tower reaching up before you. This is the tower which houses the clock and Big Ben.
Aretha Franklin advertised on the billboard as well. Aretha - bloody - Franklin. Not Ken Dodd or Frankie Vaughan: Aretha Franklin!!!
- Continue altering the page until it becomes something different.
Day two was worse. I was border line homicidal yesterday. It's a good thing I work from home, and can't harm people. Around 11 am there was a banging at the door. Flower delivery!!! The card read "Day Two...Good luck!!" and there was no name on the card. So I called my Mom to thank her. Nope!! She didn't send them. J sent me flowers!! Aww... Really sweet, but what he didn't realize was that I was on the verge of breaking (don't ever get a kitten when you work from home) and the flowers were motivation. And guilt. Because he sent me flowers, I would feel like a total shit if I broke.
I'm starting simple.
As we’ve already seen, the bulk of the various sentiment data featured in the weekly overview is supportive (in a contrarian way) of higher stock prices. Also, Rydex traders who are atrocious when it comes to market timing have thrown in the towel. The fact that this coincides with the support levels above is a good sign.
I worked really hard, burned out, and then was way too hard on myself for feeling so. The result? More burn-out.
This book has ALL what a book can have – love, jealousy, drama, heartaches, humor, strong characters and funny dialogs and passionate love scenes (though there could have been more and they could have been more intense *lol*). Please read it!!
When I was in my early twenties, I met a man named Gary, who changed me. He was the cousin of a friend and we were close. He taught me that I was beautiful, inside and out, and taught me how to let go of that anger, in so many ways. He taught me that I was beautiful, even if I didn't feel it. And I never did, until I met my husband, in 1999. My husband and I knew at our first meeting that it was destiny and nine years later, we were married. The reason? I needed to know that when my body failed me, he wasn't going to. And he hasn't failed me. He's my best friend and the joke was on me, because, with my incontinent issues, I didn't think he was going to be able to stick around. The joke? My husband was a direct care worker, who worked with a man with a colostomy bag! Haha!
Based on ingredient cost, each recipe beat the going rate for Hellmann’s at my local store. Were any of them worth the time? Bittman’s and Child’s recipes, yes. I’d make Bittman’s again first, with a neutral oil and likely adopt that as my standard, if the taste comes through as I think it would.
“Yes, Michael Cavanagh. And my wife’s name is Kerstin Übelacker. She kept her maiden name.”
Why do I continue to write about “Mary”, I ask myself. For certain it is painful and I often cry while writing this blog. I honestly feel I owe it to Mary to tell what she is afraid and ashamed to do herself, to let you know of her pain and guilt, the destruction to her humanity and soul. I wish this to never happen to another woman ever and if this sad little blog raises some sort of awareness, than my experience has not gone for not. Many of you have read my previous blog concerning my shocking and sobering experience with an infamous pornography “entertainer”. http://gerilewis.wordpress.com/2011/07/01/pornography-the-ugly-truth/
Daniel Orton – (Nike) Zoom Kobe VII – size 16
We mustn’t, just mustn’t, yes mustn’t lose heart…
Oh, Jenny don't be hasty
But they have a really nice logo.
“Everybody agrees he’s competent,” Gibson said. “… I think the issue is going to be why he’s competent.”
pick up the radio set
I entered high school and signed up for orchestra as my elective, where I became part of a sixty-piece orchestra. For Christmas freshman year, my parents bought me a violin. I started crying when I saw it. To this day it's my most memorable Christmas present.
Reprise… My father always said, “No one likes a smartass,” but, on the whole, my experience hasn’t confirmed his pronouncement. In fact, smartasses can be mighty funny, and their incisive humor can reveal hypocrisy and idiocy we should all see.
What I’m referring to is the EP “Codes and Keys” recently released by none other than Death Cab for Cutie. Now mainstream indie kingpins, they were once just the little group from Bellingham that sang in small clubs and captured the hearts of many. This album of “dance remixes” sounds like someone threw the once beautiful sounds the band makes through a wood chipper time portal. There are cowbells, kitschy snare beats, and repetitive stuttering at the beginning of phrases. One song, “Underneath the Sycamore Tree,” remixed by the (surely) renowned Dillon Francis, is like “Party Rock Anthem” vomited all over indie music. I’m reminded forcibly of Skrillex.
Photo source: www2.york.k12.tn.us
Without knowing those things, the project took me just a bit over an hour going at a leisurely pace.
I decided I needed to stop for a couple of minutes and do a post since I'll be in the air tomorrow. Today is filled with all sorts of tasks; I've already walked, started a couple of loads of laundry, wrapped birthday gifts for the party tonight, talked to a friend about dog breeds and am now ironing clothes to pack. This afternoon I'm meeting two girlfriends for coffee and prayer; one's hubby is fighting for his life with cancer and she needs time to decompress with girlfriends. I also have to run some food out to our oldest so it doesn't go to waste and stop by the store for a couple of gluten free snacks. The sheets will need changing and towels washed before we head out. Not sure if I'll get vacuuming done, but we usually do it before we leave so that we come home to a nice clean house. Hubby is off golfing and will come home and pack. We've done this trip often enough that it isn't a big deal, especially not having to pack for little ones. I hope you all have a great day; I'll be around checking in on you but probably won't post until tomorrow night or Thursday morning-but I'll be sure to post some beautiful photos of the island.
09. White House Blues
Outdoors arming, indoors arming, the flash of the musketbarrels,
Swift Brewfest Ram – Brewfest (drop – rare)
You just can't trust anyone these days, especially those fine Occupy folk who have been protesting about evil Capitalism for the last year or so. Here they were being their caring self, when they decided to occupy a Brooklyn home so that they could patch it up and move in a homeless family. Well, seems as if they lost their way and decided bugger the homeless, they were more in need and so moved in themselves. Somehow the place was trashed to the tune of $12 000 (couldn't possibly have been done by those fine Occupy folks!) and the police finally decided to un-Occupy them of the house. This is just one example of the rabid dogs who make up the Occupy Movement. And they protest Capitalism? They should rather go Occupy their families homes and show them how they have turned out to be fine upstanding law-abiding citizens.....
Crush the whole package of cookies either with a food processor, or in a bag and a rolling pin. Save a 1/2 c. to sprinkle on top of dessert when it's done. Pour remaining crumbs in a 13x9 pan. Melt butter and pour into crumb mix. Stir it up good and press crumbs in bottom of pan to make a crust. Make chocolate pudding according to package directions and let it setup in the fridge. In a mixing bowl blend cream cheese until nice and smooth and then add powdered sugar, mix. Then fold in 1-8 oz thing of cool whip. Top oreo layer with cream cheese mix, then pudding, then your last 8 oz thing of cool whip, and then sprinkle remaining Oreo's on top. Cover and refrigerate until ready to serve.
Bad news: state parks have been on the budgetary chopping block. The list includes Marjorie Kinnan Rawlings State Park, and local favorite Washington Oaks State Park, where many springs have welcomed countless visitors as the dazzling, flamboyantly glorious azaleas open their faces to the returning sunshine. For the moment Lord Voldemort has said no to the closings, but keep your eyes open, people. These lands are fragile, diverse and preserve our heritage but they are dangerously vulnerable to loss.
“We should at every opportunity ask ourselves, ‘what would Jesus do?’ and then be more courageous to act upon the answer.” (Howard W. Hunter)
Reconnecting takes time and effort.
When it came time to leave, to fly to Buffalo, New York, where my mother would have a memorial service (she lived there a good bit of her adult life, moving there from New Hampshire in 1955 and relocating to Maine in the early 1980s).
"When white people looked at us, they often seemed curious about the nature of our relationship, but few would ask questions. The unspoken code of etiquette was feigned “colorblindness,” trying not to notice racial difference. Some genuinely expressed how cute my son was, while others over-emphasized the point, as if to prove their racial tolerance. Some tried to touch my son’s hair, perhaps feeling more license to explore a seemingly exotic feature. I’d quickly reposition my son out of their reach.
Now you can even buy three of their regulars on bottle-a better souvenir from Copenhagen is hard to think of.
Joyfold card
Embrace the idea that you are sharing your genius, your gift with that person, and shower them with love and confidence. Believe in your work and in your ability to connect with the customer.
Clean the garage. Keep the garage door open while you’re doing so so that you can enjoy the nice weather.
Bake 40 to 45 minutes or until brownies begin to pull away from sides of pan. Cool completely in pan on wire rack. Cut into bars. Makes 4 big brownies or 8-12 cut servings.
See the trailer after the break.
That would be a real way of minding the gap.
Hey, we made it! You can’t fool me. I know how psyched you are at this point. We’re at Numero Uno! (I hear that drum roll……..)
Our wolfpack started as one: Rob, shaved his head for the first time back in 2008. We grew to 4 in 2009, adding Adam, Jeff and Stace (yes Stace shaved her head!). Stayed as a four-man wolfpack in 2010 and 2011, replacing Stace with Jim, then replacing Jim last year with Rick. This year we are a five man wolfpack having added Mike to the mix (a cancer survivor! thanks Mike!), and are looking to add to our growing numbers, just ask Rob how to join, it's that easy!
Unfortuantely this is the only page i have done lol, i have been busy doing journals an chunkies for Dolls Dreams, an seriuosly thinking about joining the other RR too, arghhhhhhhhhh temptation every where lol...
She understood that God made himself poor for our sake, to enrich us with his poverty full of love, to urge us to impede the insatiable greed that sparks conflicts and divisions, to invite us to moderate the mania to possess and thus to be open to reciprocal sharing and acceptance."
…When I look at myself I see a person who strangely lacks what I consider the ingredients for a personality. I can see personality in other people but I can’t see any in myself. One feels that perhaps through playing so many characters one becomes a sort of nil on one’s own account.”
"You can give without loving, but you can¹t love without giving." Amish proverb
in the middle of all these monsters and wizards and princesses, was
Chicken- 4 Lbs
I don't sing Bob's praises near enough as he deserves them, but he really is the best. He picks up the slack when I drop it and does more for Claire and I than I imagine most men even think of doing. He cooks, cleans, entertains and provides.
salt, pepper, and nutmeg to taste
Team 420 is falling apart, probably as there is no quarterback to hold the team together. Papa however, is on the rise and will be getting an upset this week and making it to at the least round 2. I attribute this mostly to Gronk, look for him to make the big plays against denver this week while Welker gets the most attention from the all star secondary.
He is getting to be quite the talker so he'd point and say something like
In the afternoon we head over to my in laws house for Easter dinner and a BIG egg hunt. They have around 45 people over for dinner and have wonderful Italian food. The kids have so much fun because there are around 13 cousins for them to play with. The egg hunt was huge this year with 171 eggs!! Kids were running all over the place looking for eggs and it did not take long for all 171 of those eggs to be found. We had eggs for days here. Nicolas was very happy because he "made" $35 in the egg hunt. He told me on the way home from my in laws house that he wanted to buy a few DS game and some Lego's with the money. Boy was disappointed when he found out $35 dollars did not go that far. To be young again!
a grand gesture
Julian’s take home pay for the last ten years had been anywhere from a hundred to a hundred and twenty-five grand-depending on his yearly business earnings-allowing us the luxury of a five bedroom, four and a half bath home complete with maids quarters, an extra-large gourmet kitchen, a den, a home office, three fireplaces, a three car and one golf cart garage, swimming pool, Jacuzzi, housekeeping, landscaping and pool services; a Hummer SUV, a Hummer SUT, a Grand Caravan, credit cards, five cell phones, a combined savings account, two unlimited checking accounts, and two to three Vacations per year.
On Saturday15th of October 2011, the Afrikaans Newspaper Beeld ran an article about an interview with General Geldenhuys titled, “Die ‘klein generaaltjie’ is die moer in” (The ‘little general’ is f***ing irate).
lastly, i’ve been indulging in silent films, some of which I’m not sure I understand, others that have abstractly moved me beyond, but all of which have reminded me that expression is part of human nature in a way that I am not sure nature does consciously, though I recognize nature expresses through evolutionary trends of defense, attraction, and instinct. (please share your debates on this issue)
Dungeons & Dragons
Husband: Manny Franks (her agent, m. 10-Jan-1945, div. 10-Dec-1956)
Anyway after the cleanout and a venture out into the sunlight, I have spent the rest of the evening perfecting my Beyonce dance moves. Yes, I do watch Beyonce videos on repeat just to pick up moves. I’m rubbish and shy but when she comes on in a club I become a different person and have to act out parts of the videos.
With Laz’s gear being good for normals, but still coming along as far as Heroics, we were told to expect Laz to be shifted in and out. However, due to a DC, this turned into him participating in the entirety of our run Wednesday, then continuing through Thursday.
How do I tell my husband that I’m on the verge of asking for a divorce because of the way he treats the kids? He’s not violent but his attitude is atrocious. He lectures the eldest while the youngest gets away with everything. Nothing my older son does is good enough, and it’s causing him to be depressed to the point he’s said he’s wished he were dead.
3) The hair color is way too dark.
Wow, that was a lot tougher than I thought it was going to be. Phew. Now I get to choose three lucky people to do it if they so wish! Here we go…
These old bones live to learn her wanton ways:
Never think of never
Age shall not weary them, nor the years condemn.
Never try to walk, swim, or drive through swiftly moving high water. Six inches of fast moving flood water has the power to knock you off your feet, and a depth of two feet can float your car! If you come upon flood waters, stop, turn around and go another way.
THE HERMES-INSPIRED HEADSCARF
Wander over if you will. Don't judge too harshly. Know that once it's up and running, I'll let you all know! Heck, I may even throw a party.
Preheat oven to 375 and make topping: 1 cup all purpose flour, 1 cup old fashioned oats, 1/2 cup sugar, 1/2 cup brown sugar, 1/2 tsp ground ginger, 1/2 tsp ground nutmeg, 1/2 cup butter cut into small pieces, 1/2 cup sliced almonds (optional). Cut butter into mixture with 2 knives or pastry blender.
(This post was delayed from Friday due to some sort of problem with Blogger. I'll post an up to date report later.)
I finally got Jared to go through his clothes and get rid of all the shirts he doesn't wear anymore. A smart person would have donated them somewhere. I decided to start working on making a king sized t-shirt quilt.
mourned the dead
In the end, I am not telling you to do what everyone else does and I am not telling you that you cannot have personal goals or a personality that is unique in general. What I am saying is that people need to have more respect for our race as a unified group of beings that can accomplish nothing on their own. Don’t try to tell me about all the individual things people have done throughout history because every single one of these accomplishments may have been finished or started by a single person but in almost every case they were the result of continuing or building upon the thoughts of those before who strove for the same goals.
Week 17 of our 365 Photo Challenge.
And noticed how it blends together?
I also guessed that Dustin Hoffman’s accountant guy will probably not last the season. I was not expecting it to happen so soon, i.e. about 20 minutes later (assuming he is dead), but that’s what happened. Did Chester know this was likely so paying him a million a year was just an empty promise? Possibly. Michael Gambon was great, and scary as erm, Michael. The guy is fabulous with the right material. Check him out in the original Dennis Potter drama “The Singing Detective“, the classic BBC series, not the crappy film version starring Robert Downy junior. It’s a real classic piece of TV, and you’ll notice a huge influence on lots of different shows that followed. For guys, it contains one of the most wince inducing hospital rubdown scenes you will ever see.
Pétur (drums and wickedness
TNT Tauna
I declared the stairs not technically inside. I guess they agreed because no one told me off.
‘Blimey, what a woman.’ Frank’s at the window now he knows there’s something worth watching. I stand beside him and we see Jenny shivering. ‘You can’t go interfering.’
So if you're trying to sell me on a book, you should never give me a description. Well, maybe a small one. For example, if you're trying to get me to read Jurassic Park, you might say, "This has dinosaurs in it." That's it. Here's It: "There's a clown." And now Silence of the Lambs: "There's a couple serial killers." Slaughterhouse-Five: "It's about WW II." Or possibly "It's about time travel." But don't say "WWII and time travel," that's too much, and I've already decided that it's going to be stupid.
#49: I think this is the only Jeff Bridges card in the pack. Hard to tell. This is from the scene where he plays some kind of cyber-Jai alai against an insurance program.
Hello and welcome to the Prince Melon Records site.
Jakie's husband was asking about the location of the former oil fields that were on the top of the mountain. A friend of mine and I'd found them years before and I told him that I could direct him there. Once again, we piled into the truck, minus our cousins/guides. We drove to the oil field ruins and, as I write this, I'm reminded that I need to take pictures of them the next time I go up there. You can see foundations as well as old pumps. As we made our way back to Irvine, we discussed the Granny Richardson School that had been located there, before it was moved to the campus of Eastern Kentucky University in Richmond.
The three I am going to list are the most readily available at your local liquor superstore. You may even be able to find at least one of these at your smaller neighborhood store and if they don't carry it, ask, and tell them why it would be beneficial for them to carry them.
So why hasn't Philippa Gregory, in my opinion?
“Just provided you wait until we’re safe,” he grumbled, pushing to his feet. His head swam, and he let himself lean against the cliff. “There must be a Sherim somewhere nearby, and it’s nearly night.”
Not such a good example? Well I’ll leave the rest to your imaginations then, but you get the gist. In the game, people mishear what has been whispered and gather different meanings/interpretations from it thus repeating it to the next person who will listen. So you can see how things when whispered around can be misheard and misinterpreted as something else. What we don’t realize is how much farther from the truth things can change. If you’ve heard someone gossip about you and you disliked what you heard then why would you feel the need to gossip about someone else behind their back if you knew how it felt? A lot of people don’t think twice about what they are doing and understand the consequences that could ensue. I’ve heard a lot of lies about myself and most of the time I don’t care but sometimes there are those comments that make you wonder and really do get to you. Best thing is to bury it deep into your mind and throw it away because there’s no point in getting insecure about little minor things. Though I must admit how surprised I was to be the center of gossip which was outrageously untrue and which I absolutely hated. How farther can the truth can people get. Very far apparently. But most of all I am a very boring person in the sense that I like doing interesting things such as rock climbing or travelling, but in general my life is very boring as I don’t do much except work nowadays. So there is no need for useless idle gossip, but as most would say it’s entertaining!
Fuck yeah Deathcrush
He calls for "zone one". Wait 5 minutes. No one moves.
The slow foundational firming and improvement that we’ve been observing since mid-March is becoming tangibly personal — not a theory, not something we’re witnessing in our environment, but something we are experiencing for ourselves. The Sun is bringing that to fruition, along with some of the promise of last Saturday’s Taurus New Moon.
According LCMS‘ website, “Today, the LCMS has more than 2.3 million baptized members in some 6,200 congregations and more than 9,000 pastors. Two seminaries and 10 colleges and universities operate under the auspices of the LCMS, and its congregations operate the largest Protestant parochial school system in America.”
Anyways....ya know how they tell you to count back from 100 for anesthesia, and you never get even to 98? Well, I started counting back at 100 a little at a time when I got to the hospital during the 2.5 hours of check-in and prep. By 9 am I was down to about 11. While wheeling me down the hall to the OR, I did 5-4-3-2....they told me to wait, none of that counts yet. So what happens? they knock me out in the operating room without telling me, so I never did get down to 1. Oh well.
and even if we do have that “bonus” time,
People sometimes get hung up on what it takes to succeed (often in this field) and how hard it can be, and what a long road it is, and on all the things standing in their way, but seriously, who in the world doesn’t possess the innate capability to harness just 20 second of inner power to move from here to there, now to then, from a moment into success? Not this girl. I’ve got 20 seconds all-day-long…and then some.
George Bartman, Vice President of Marketing and Sales
Bran is a nice but annoying dude. I've heard of him since I was in form 1, I think, from Sze Yie. Yes, that's my girl, Sze Yie ;) I've heard a lot about him and I always thought that Sze Yie has a thing for him by the way she talked about him. But the story was actually the other way round. No, it's not the other way round. There's another way to another round. I don't know. Dafuq?
“A little handsome,” but not too much, says Altine Abdullahi. “It’s a danger.”
David Davies, the Conservative MP for Monmouth and a special constable with the British Transport Police said: ‘This is frankly ludicrous,’ whilst a spokesman for Durham Constabulary defended its guide saying: ‘It makes good sense to provide staff with advice and support to enable them to function effectively while maintaining a good work/life balance.’
I prefer Cuban rum when I can get it. Not "Cuban Style" or "Cuban Recipe"...CUBAN rum. From Cuba. Havana Club to be precise. I buy it when and where I can. I usually find it in the Caribbean but have found single barrel limited runs in Copenhagen of all places.
More and more people are waking up and looking around with clear vision. Occupy Wall Street and other local occupy movements are still alive and well. They are asking for new ways to go about business, commerce and public governance. If enough of us wake up soon enough, we can make change in this world. It’s not about hope, cause hope is the future, I’m talking about what we can do now. Wake up now and embrace your inner fears so that you can move through those fears into love. As you change who you are now, you change the world.
I created two prints using a cropped and edited photo of mangos. The first one had too much paint in the wash, I wasn't happy with the deep orange color. Here are shots of both printings.
It's surface jagged
This piece was inspired by an image (top of this page) randomly chosen for a portal/prompt. The image is titled Persephone (c) Selina di Girolamo 1998 from We'Moon '00 --
I really loved how this story is progressing. The adrenaline and risk has definitely been increased in this book, with persistent attacks by Furies and Pierce trying to elude the living while still ensuring her family's safety. There is a much stronger sense of danger that is palpable throughout the pages and really makes this story all the more enjoyable. Everything is written so much more intensely- the romance is deeper between Pierce and John, loyalties to friends and family are tested, the Furies are much stronger and a HUGE revelation is made regarding John's past.
Vote or Do (something as useful.)
Or, of course, you could just protest. Which many people out in BC have decided to do! Here are just a few interesting links and videos on that subject:
The farther backward you can look, the farther forward you are likely to see. –SIR WINSTON CHURCHILL
Also another good tip is to get a discount. Most of us are shy about getting a discount but in fact some discounts are given when asked for. Certain discounts may not necessarily come in the form of a reduction of the overall price but can come in the form of an add on. For example you may ask for free maid service for a year on top of the purchase. There are many other things that you can ask for, all you need to do is to explore.
cheeks full, not gaunt
Instagram has become very popular over the past few months, especially after it’s arrival on Androids. Instagram is a way to post and share pictures through a mobile app. You can edit the pictures for different effects and share them. There has been debates as to whether or not Instagram is acceptable for journalism.
Mockingjay by Suzanne Collins - Still not thrilled with it. I'm not as numb and exhausted as I was when I first read it. Thanks for reading it with me, anyway Kevin.
No Way No Way reached the dizzying heights of number 14 in the UK Singles Chart. Based on the late Italian film composer Piero Umiliani's one-off novelty hit Mah Nà Mah Nà (later popularised by the Muppets and by its inclusion in many Benny Hill episodes), the video which accompanied the single (filmed, incidentally, in Brockwell Lido – not Charlton as claimed by Wikipedia) won the dubious title of Worst Music Video Ever on the 1997 ITV Chart Show end-of-year special. The song itself was voted number 26 on Channel 4's 100 Worst Pop Records.
Ah. Footwear. Paris. Anxiety. Should I take (a) brown shearling-lined matronly, totally warm suede boots, (b) my tall black-leather equestrian boots, or (c) my favorite new over-the-knee grey suede Stuart Weitzman zingy-make-me-feel-hip boots?
- When you put others ahead of yourself ALL THE TIME, you end up being angry, resentful, and quite simply fatigued. This often leads to emotional eating to make yourself feel better, emotionally, and more energized, physically.
A dark, medium and light prisma pencil or similar, I used Ultramarine, True Blue and Cloud Blue
Over the past 10 years the loonie did what few had expected. Before the currency’s “power decade” commenced, experts were well accustomed to worrying about its health. The 1990s were not kind to our dollar as it fluctuated between a high of 89.34 cents in 1991 and a low of 63.11 cents in 1998. Some expected it to plummet toward 50 cents, and there were calls for our currency to be pegged to the U.S. dollar to prevent what many predicted would be catastrophe.
It was during that anti-climactic epiphany that I stumbled across a recipe for corn cakes complimented by a savory shrimp and lump crabmeat salad. It was literally moments later that I was down to the grocery store gathering ingredients.
This is why. How could you NOT drool over this?? (The earrings, not my dazzling wind is blowing in my eyes smile)
"Every action of our lives touches on some chord that will vibrate in eternity."
Lots of iPhones get stolen, right?
* Let the kids choose one of the kids kits at Hobby Lobby (hopefully when they are on sale), and take a day to actually do it!
i feel I own,being with you.
Grenache Gris, with just a hint, 3%, Muscat. Quite leesy and a touch of oak on the nose. A dry resinous note, balanced by a rounded textured palate, with some dry honey on the finish. Very intriguing. However, the wine is sold out and the 2010 about to be shipped to London.
1 teaspoon mustard (rai) powder
I never did get around to finishing the spring quilt this afternoon that I am working on perhaps tomorrow, instead it's been yet more seed sowing (carrot, celery, cauliflower), and more wine racking.
The weekly 'Athletics Union' nights held in the Students' Union bar were even more depraved.
Jay Brooks at Brookston Beer Bulletin posted a nice editorial about Budweiser's Fan Cans and the all too predictable outcry it has created. School administrators argue that the cans will cause underage drinking and binge drinking and do not want the cans distributed near the schools. If the argument was simply about the copyright, I could understand it. But I don't see how an orange and white can without the school name on it will cause retailers to sell beer to minors.
But, hey, where do I click to delete my cookies?
So...it is Fridge Friday, and I have just a miserable hotel room fridge, and I didn't get Mexican food, but that doesn't mean that I wouldn't jump at the chance to have Denise's Spanish Rice On My Plate.
I also read this fabulous book by Luisa Perkins called Dispirited. This one's a creeptastic ghost story meets out-of-body experiences meets a coming of age. Luisa has some of the most gorgeous language I've ever read. I highly recommend both books. They're fabulous!
1. Pam at The Bug Bytes-for always being a wonderful resource on her blog and on the Cricut MB. She also was the first person to accept me on to a design team. Thanks for the wonderful opportunity Pam!
Raymond Colitt – Reuters, 02/15/10
power and destruction
The theme of this hop as I've mentioned is FAIRY Day so what we are doing on this hop is bringing together a select few people from all over the world to take part and for them to create a project with a fairy or fairies on it.
Best Vacation
As for my schedule, I write every day, come high water, snakebite, or my mother-in-law. Once my kids started school, it got simple: the school bus came at 7:55 a.m., and returned at 3:45 p.m. Those were the hours when I could write. I thought it was perfect. However, once, while under deadline pressure, I opened my office door to find that the kids had taped a note to it: "Warning - she eats her young."
It also means that as citizens living at or below the poverty line, they get free healthcare through Medicaid, housing subsidies through HUD, food stamps and WIC (Women, Infants, Children) benefits--plus welfare through SSI.
Resolved, 2nd. That while we mourn his loss and miss his association, we bow with meek submission to the will of Him who doeth all things well.
OK so let’s think about this for just a minute. Quarterly earnings come out every 90 days and most companies let investors know when they will announce. Ralcorp was subject to a take-over that was pulled. Conagra (NYSE:CAG) changed their mind. Now a week before the numbers are signed off the company says they anticipated non cash goodwill impairment.
“With fangs,” the boy helpfully added.
“Reese doesn’t talk to strangers.” Emily didn’t look up from her food as she talked. Reese just ignored both of them, eating his food slowly. He was a much neater eater than his sister, Reese making sure not to spill his milk or talk with food in his mouth.
My Twitter and the rest
Why is it that 20 minutes after we get in bed, you decide you just now want the food you were eating 4 hours ago..
Candlelit Eyes; A Jack-o-Lanterns Point of View
At any rate, putting this musing aside, my question is this: is there any scientific fact or theory that is widely accepted despite the fact that it is not in principle capable of being falsified? I am referring to real theories here, not possible theories.
And I came away with the disturbing knowledge that once you take the "pink" and horse books out of the equation, series with female protagonists do not seem to be being written for emerging readers. We have boys having adventures and boy/girl pairs. Apparently girls can't stand alone--even as animal characters--unless they are princesses or fairies.
Moon winked at Ziggy then ran towards the long grass, shouting out behind him as he ran -
16If I kept back the desire of the poor; if the widow’s eye was looking for help to no purpose;
was a bit wearing.
Not only do I think it will be important for personal use, but I also think it will become an obligation for businesses. I believe it will even become a necessity, regardless of the type of business that an individual is currently operating or working for.
There's the Celtic/Pagan Bonfire Dance:
About The Authors:
NOW: creating is a global trend: the active consumer, develops solutions and shares them with the community, which then again can learn and improve. Crowd-sourcing, liquid democracy and open-source are hints toward this trend.
to Michigan, traveling on
Now the unique thing about this product is it contains a 'book' and a puzzle. You are meant to read the 'book', assemble the puzzle, and then solve the mystery using clues from both. I use the term 'book' here VERY loosely. Upon opening the box, I was disgusted at what apparently passes for a 'book' these days.
-We can learn more about writing via posts that are pinned.
Climbed a tree and tore my pants
Here is an example of one of the tall styles:
I made the delicious quiche for Sunday brunch and then we had to test whether it would make a delicious Sunday night dinner with some greens (it did).
Ji-tae Yu's Woo-Jin is the perfect contrast. He's everything that Dae Su is not. He has no interest in getting his hands dirty at all, perfectly content to hide in the background and let others do the work. Where Dae Su welcomes violence to vent his rage, Woo jin sees it as a very small gesture, putting much more value on the lasting damage he can do, by affecting someone's mind and actions. His malice doesn't care about any casualties, provided Dae Su has full knowledge of what he did and what revenge has been taken against him. To kill Dae Su would be to make his plan less effective, better to let him live in a situation that's completely abhorrent to him, knowing that his own actions were in some way responsible.
33. “Fear, uncertainty and discomfort are your compasses toward growth.”
We're planning a trip to the Toledo zoo in June and I cannot wait!! Aiden's never been, so he'll love it! I used to go all the time when I was little and we were visiting my grandparents. I remember the gorillas the most! I especially remember one, whom I believed was named Max, who used to escape all of the time, lol. Allie is going to go crazy! This girl loves her animals! She squeels and claps whenever any animal is around. Heck, she even gets excited over the sight of stuffed animals. I really want to take her to Binder Park Zoo as well. ONLY because they have an awesome giraffe exhibit, where you get on this platform and the giraffes walk right up to you and you can feed them! I can only imagine how excited she would be! Other than that, I don't care much for that zoo. It's a semi-rip off for what they offer. But, the kids always have a good time, so I won't complain! :)
1926
First, it has become apparent that whoever is in charge of alcohol guidelines is an absolute, perfectly formed moron. The new guidelines, published 2012, have come about because the old guidelines, published 1995, “appeared to endorse daily drinking” (direct quote that, a real one too and not one I’ve just made up for a change).
Nature thinks different from man and woman seeks nature not yet realizing its powers to merge substance to substance formerly me. Death be present before I live now, treating seriously the challenge the woman I am.
(16:3-5) For in the last days false prophets and seducers shall be multiplied, and the sheep shall be turned into wolves, and love shall be turned into hate; and because iniquity aboundeth they shall hate each other, and persecute each other, and deliver each other up; and then shall the Deceiver of the world appear as the Son of God, and shall do signs and wonders, and the earth shall be delivered into his hands; and he shall do unlawful things, such as have never happened since the beginning of the world.
Apple, in this EULA, is claiming a right not just to its software, but to its software’s output. It’s akin to Microsoft trying to restrict what people can do with Word documents, or Adobe declaring that if you use Photoshop to export a JPEG, you can’t freely sell it to Getty. As far as I know, in the consumer software industry, this practice is unprecedented.
The idea is to use the support of a group of like-minded crafters to tackle a lacy pattern – in lace-weight – using either crochet or knitting at some time in 2012. There are those who are using the motivation to finish some existing lace-weight projects – I’ll be doing Petals, as I’ve mentioned above. There are others who are getting into training by using sock-weight in a lacy project; with the ultimate challenge of a lace-weight project in their sights.
“HEY! What’s that?”
(Jesus is King of Kings)
The book begins with Mrs. Ormiston Chant's 1894 famous investigation of prostitutes at the Empire Music Hall in Leicester Square - finding women 'very much painted' (wearing make-up!) prowling the Empire's promenade, on the look out for male company. It moves on from the Victorian era to the Edwardians, focussing on Maud Allan's racy dance interpretation of 'Salome' which drew a new female audience to West End theatres. Some were girlishly adoring - I love the quote from a fan letter: 'I saw you and thought your dancing perfect. I tried to move my arms like yours, but they seemed to have much fewer joints'.
- a few rose petals (washed thoroughly, make sure also they have never had chemicals sprayed on them)
He had those stubby hands.
The main pharmacological treatments historically for T2DM have been aimed at overcoming insulin resistance (metformin), and stimulating insulin production while the pancreas is still able to produce any (sulphonylureas, pioglitazone). Another treatment that can be prescribed is a glucosidase inhibitor (acarbose), which inhibits the digestion of carbohydrate in the gut so that it does not enter the bloodstream, but often produces severe flatulence.
1-3 tsp. chlorella
I was able to sleep in until 8:00 this morning! (Well, sorta, Kyan kept coming in and saying things like "But I don't WANT Daddy to feed me breakfast. I want YOU to feed me breakfast" and "Could you please just get up?" Thanks kid). I remember the days when sleeping in meant not getting up until well after 10:00. Now 8:00 feels like an accomplishment. Partly because I myself am now old. And partly because I am the parent of an 89-year-old trapped in the body of a preschooler. Kyan requests to go to bed around 7:30 every night and is up with the sun. *Yawn* His brother and sister will both happily sleep until after 8:00, sometimes even 9 or 10. But Kykers . . . *Sigh*
Runner Up : Ales by Mail
Now, couple that with fear because it isn't always just gropes, pinches or comments--sometimes it's much, much more--and you start to understand why some folks would rather just stay the fuck home.
2. Isabella Stewart Gardner Museum – Surprise, surprise… another museum as well as date #2. So this woman marries a rich man. She’s also got a rich dad who leaves her money. So she buys lots of priceless art and makes an entire building dedicated to it, complete with a breathtaking courtyard. This place blew me away. Every room is a time warp to a different century and different country. Wow. That’s all I got to say.
Alex and I watched a BBC animated version of A Midsummer Night's Dream several years ago. Last night I watched the first of the 3 parts of Julius Caesar. (You can Google parts 2 and 3.) I plan on watching the entire movie with Alex.
It's the end of the semester. You have been hanging out with a young lady for most of the last few weeks. All of the sudden you've realized summer is here and you are ready for some new summer lovin'! A few of my friends are in this position. They're ready for summer and all the crazy stories that come with it.
“Parents?”
Kitty xx
I don’t like being on one side of the fog. It is very frustrating for me to not be able to see the other side … the end result. I’m not even sure of my own footing. But what I do know is that God is there. He is right with me, and if I stop worrying about all of the “what ifs”, “I can’t do that”, and “How’s that suppose to happen?”, I’ll find myself at the end of one faith journey. God has great things in store for me, I just have to stop looking at the fog and look at God instead.
LaBolt said the administration “shared this information in confidence and with certain expectations.” Those expectations were that the British would support its effort to cover up the full extent of our human rights violations.”
*Reduce blood pressure
The eye patch forces the lazy eye to work and thus, strengthens its vision and its muscles. This is the most common method used to treat lazy eye. To prevent the strong eye from becoming weaken due to disuse, the child is allowed to remove the patch so that he can see with the good eye for at least a few hours each day.
I reckon our Constitution, if it has any meaning at all as the supreme law of the land, must mean precisely what our Founders intended it to mean at the time they penned it, except as duly amended. Since the process for amending it is clearly prescribed, I utterly reject the notion of a “Living Constitution” that can be capriciously modified by creative “interpretations” of partisan judicial activists, to give the government powers to meddle in our daily lives they clearly were never meant to have.
Today I'm being taken on a tour of the area, and tomorrow I go home. Be prepared for lots of pictures of Buxtehude, bulls, and extremely pink suitcases!
Fast forward to 5 years from now…Google is using its position as a software provider and hardware manufacturer to optimize its platform around key hardware elements such as the chipset. The carriers have been migrated out of the hardware specification business by Google for over 5 years. Companies such as Intel and Qualcomm are being played off of each other by a few centralized platform providers (e.g. Apple, Google) who essentially control the chipset providers (and other key parts providers) market share by balancing their software optimizations. In other words, with fewer players controlling the ecosystem, parts providers must sell to “the few” rather than “the many” and have their market share dictated to them by “the few”. Think of this visually as a funnel with Qualcomm’s large sales force as the large opening and Google and Apple being the small stem of the funnel.
linoleum blocks, pillows that don’t match
Both my Studly Hubby and my Tornado Toddler are budding photographers. Perhaps it is not a coincidence that they both have this leaning. The toddler got a camera for Christmas and she takes it everywhere and makes everyone (and everything) in her path "SAY CHEESE!!!" She clicks the camera only at select and often unexpected times so the pictures that end up on its little memory card are often more like a surreal dream than formal portraits.
At one point, we were working on our triceps by doing a a funky one-armed push up while laying (lying? I can never remember!) on our sides. Chad, I'm not sure if I'm doing it right.
"Can we go???" in that all excited tone.
The Camera Club of New York (CCNY) is pleased to announce an open call for applications for its Annual National Photography Competition. Photographers and photo–based artists working in any genre are eligible to apply. Applicants are encouraged to submit a cohesive body of work.
My friend picked me up at my place and she drove us to Georgetown for a cupcake shopping and play date at a cute little park in Georgetown. I wrote a post about Georgetown before and posted some pictures of Georgetown Cupcake I took from outside on there. There was a long line going around the store. Yes, Georgetown Cupcake is a very popular and only cupcakery in town. I’ve been meaning to go check it out for a long time, but I have never had a chance till now. Georgetown is not so easy to access as there is no train that goes there and parking is expensive. I’m glad we finally did! Thanks, Maca!
The group achieved the peak of their popularity during the 1980′s with numerous chart hits in the US and a number of Music Videos that received heavy airplay on MTV.
I finished the (insert the appropriate curse word here) project I was working on in my last post. I am proud that I finished it but it fought me all the way. The sewing went so badly that I went to my sister's house to do the button holes, which are no fun to take out over and over. It also convinced me it is time to buy a better machine. The project was to make a nice warm vest for my Dad.
reported, “I said it all day and all night, and before long the light
Please say I'm not the only one who does this!
In all likelihood, they'd just watched for the first sign of humans attacking the Wildhawk, which meant being somewhere with line of sight to the town. On the hills around the Federas valley? Nothing in Dagdan's Witnessing showed the kind of strain that came from Gifts employed close to a Sherim, so they were probably somewhere to the North.
Nothing beats a soup made from homemade stock and that's where this recipe starts by using choice chicken but I've made it using a whole hen too. I bet a deli roasted chicken would do just fine too in getting ya moving a little faster. The secret is cooking down the chicken along with the bones, that's where the start of a good stock begins. The noodles cook in the stock as does the vegetables which by the time everything melds together, you really end up with a super thick and rich stock made extra creamy with a good dose of heavy cream at the end. Season it however you like, I happen to like a slight thyme flavored broth. Every thing is here for a reason and comes together for needed nutrients that is good for you. The use of ginger and jalapeno along with the vegetables together form a broth full of antioxidants and vitamins yet neither one overpowers or is even noticeable. So what ever you do, do not leave them out, not if you're cooking this to feel better.
Racked: 07-23-2007
Some concerns that were discussed included:
The opinion, by Circuit Judge William Fletcher, found no general jurisdiction over the Ohio website. However, the court found specific jurisdiction based on the activities of the Ohio website directed towards California residents, the serious commercial purpose and national fame of the Ohio website, its expectation knowledge that California residents would be its clients, and its purposeful infringement of a copyright owned by a California resident.
I really need to upgrade my Podbean account now. The only question is do I choose the system with a huge amount of space or do I pick the one with less space, but monthly space increases? I'll probably go with the second really. ALL THAT SPACE. Plus I won't need it immediately.
Meanwhile, bring a pot of water to a boil. This is for the farro. I am in love with farro right now. It’s a whole grain wheat that’s good and good for you. (If you are wheat intolerant, you could use rice or quinoa, instead.)
Anyway, all of you are the ribbons on my year. Thank you for the inspiration, the support, the encouragement, the new directions and the success I've found. It's not measured in dollar signs at this point, but in winning over some grains of sand to my beach. Thank you for joining me on this adventure. I can't wait to see what 2012 brings for all of you. There's an amazing amount of talent out there and I'm fortunate to rub elbows with a lot of that great talent.
The shadows have good pigment, feel really smooth and blend very well. All the shadows are shimmery.
"You're saying Jehovah died and rose, too?"
I love how you can see hay everywhere on the floor on this party,
Honour him, 0 my soul, for he comes to save you. Come, hasten to greet him!
1/4 cup (60 ml) milk
I started arena the bold adapted away, and was afraid at how brittle and ablaze the animation were — Complete Aphotic looks as acceptable as you bethink it looking, and bigger than it in actuality looked — but what in actuality bent my absorption was how abundant the faces were. While a lot of of the graphical updates are artlessly cast new hi-res textures to alter the originals, appearance models were in actuality rebuilt with college polygon counts. Even Jo's duke and gun in first-person are remodeled. You can in actuality achieve out the abstracts on the faces, and appearance such as aperture and eyes are able-bodied defined. This abominably makes cinemas a little annoying because, like the original, the faces are all changeless and there is no lip sync.
And when they came nigh to Jerusalem, unto Bethphage and Bethany, at the mount of Olives, he sendeth forth two of his disciples, And saith unto them, Go your way into the village over against you: and as soon as ye be entered into it, ye shall find a colt tied, whereon never man sat; loose him, and bring him. And if any man say unto you, Why do ye this? say ye that the Lord hath need of him; and straightway he will send him hither. And they went their way, and found the colt tied by the door without in a place where two ways met; and they loose him. And certain of them that stood there said unto them, What do ye, loosing the colt? And they said unto them even as Jesus had commanded: and they let them go. And they brought the colt to Jesus, and cast their garments on him; and he sat upon him. And many spread their garments in the way: and others cut down branches off the trees, and strawed them in the way. And they that went before, and they that followed, cried, saying, Hosanna; Blessed is he that cometh in the name of the Lord: Blessed be the kingdom of our father David, that cometh in the name of the Lord: Hosanna in the highest. And Jesus entered into Jerusalem, and into the temple: and when he had looked round about upon all things, and now the eventide was come, he went out unto Bethany with the twelve.
Some little flowers I put in a vase in the upstairs bathroom for my guests.
In honour of my optimistic Spring feeling today I am giving you a recipe for a lovely Daffodil Cake. I hope you try it and it brings a little sunshine to your day.
Things went pretty much as I expected. She was scared, and had lots of questions. Whenever we would go anywhere, she would get very nervous and ask tons of questions about where we were going and if we were going to come back to the house afterward. She would also switch between being nice and obedient to being incredibly defiant, screaming and crying.
It got to almost 50 degrees yesterday..and it rained. The snow is retreating fast. The snow stick still has some icy snow around it but it may be gone any minute especially if it continues to rain.
Advocacy disguised as expertise, the people making and controlling US military policy are also the ones who profit from violence, profit when the US is at war. Increasingly US foreign policy is military policy.
Fundamentally, the producer’s job is to help you achieve the recording that you (and your label) set out to make. This may sound like the engineer’s role, but many elements other than purely sonic clarity go into the crafting of your final product. On the music side of things, these may include songwriting and arrangement adjustments, as well as coaching musicians and coaxing peak musical performances. In the control room, there are decisions to be made about sonic treatment and creative mixes, while style and popular idiom must be addressed in anticipation of marketing the disc. In short, the producer must keep an eye on the Big Picture. The engineer is already quite busy with the technical side of things, and isn’t necessarily listening with a view to the ultimate creative goals of the project. Further, recognize that it is extremely hard for any artist to maintain this view while in the thick of recording. This view requires an objectivity which is unfair to expect of yourself while pouring your heart into your performances. In essence, the producer is there to help keep you on track. The producer is the go-between: translating the artists’ needs, the engineers technical point of view, and sometimes the label’s interests.
Mistletoe also is typically shown with three berries in a clump, which makes perfect sense. With its symbolism hearkening back to semen, an average man is only good for about three white showers a day, if you know what I mean. Not that I would have first hand knowledge about that. *shifty-eyed*
Short, Gerhardt and Rene, arrested on trumped-up charges:
"Lady ED Lomax" it read.
Employer
“The Garden Tomb is endeavoring to be a neutral venue for both Israelis and Palestinians to feel safe to worship together — Easter is not the only such event here each year but of course the pinnacle,” Meryon told Travelujah.
Friday night I decided to jump on the brick bandwagon.
It is the sun that lasts, that rules, holds sway,
Before I annouce who has been chosen to join the team, I would like to say a huge thank you to everyone who applied. I wish I could of took you all on, but of course that is not possible.
2 ½ cups all purpose flour
An intense Glycolic cleanser for all skin types except extremely sensitive skin. Combined with Anti-Aging Natural Green tea, Aloe nutrient extracts, and Alpha Hydroxy Acids to promote cell renewal & rejuvenation. Formulated to remove dirt, oil, environmental pollutants and make-up residue. The high Glycolic content will bring the skin's pH level down to prep for the application of a peel or at-home exfoliation. When used on its own as a daily cleanser, it will continue the cell turnover process, helping to maintain professional treatments. Free from artificial perfumes and dyes, with a pleasant natural chamomile fragrance.
For what reasons do you save stuff? What inconsequential objects do you love?
“Faith is the confidence that what we hope for will actually happen; it gives us assurance about things we cannot see.” – Hebrews 11:1
your memory, rule your heart, and guide
Total duration: 76 minutes 50 seconds
A disturbing development, these kind of tactics are significant in that they require prior training, and indicate a degree of organization beyond that of a simple grassroots movement.
Cosmos, as in Carl Sagan. Not Cosmo as in Cosmopolitan.
Who's your favourite fictional hero?
Move forward some two hundred and thirty years and a new ruling class, no more in touch with reality than the one swept away by the revolution of 1789-99, are building their own Petit Trianons, fantasy worlds populated with unreal people playing the pretend roles they want to see them play, and where fake truths become law.
Accessories: SU Square Lattice EF, Oval & Oval Scallop Nestibilties, Pumpkin Pie 1/4 Grosgrain Ribbon, Recollections White Pearls, Dimensionals, Scor Tape
I'm learning to simply Obey you
This post is about the comments about the soldiers. About little-known scientists who created something great. About the starving children in Africa. About the saints and the sinners and the people in between.
Do it and you’ll get 1 coin if you’re not a character that was released in the Legend Update (non-Cannon Shooters, Mercedes, or Demon Slayers), and 2 coins if you are (except Monster Park, which you get 1 coin whether or not you’re a Cannon Shooter/the other jobs).
She did not laugh. In my experience, people seldom do when I say things.
Later taters!
I can't take the smell, can't take the noise
Rnd 4-8) ch2, dc in each st around
07. The Wall
Always, this heart cannot be lied, can’t be fooled by my fake smiles.
We will make discoveries!
“For this is what the LORD says: “Even the captives of a mighty man will be taken, and the prey of a tyrant will be delivered; I will contend with the one who contends with you, and I will save your children.” Isaiah. 49:25
However, we had a lot to get through before our Hallowe'en was done: Sonshine was going out for his Hallowe'en with the Meerkat - dressed as The Honey Monster and the Cookie Monster. The Meerkat's mother is a dab hand with the sewing machine and she just ran up a couple of fabulous costumes.
We decided to edit this one. Barone’s original number 7 was: You’re inclined to call people’s wives “douchettes.” Apparently, a CEO actually did call some­one’s wife a douchette, [2] although not online. Nevertheless, if your business has folks in it who might be inclined to disparage others, think twice about bringing this sort of thing to social computing.
I’m cooking…lots and lots of crockpot meals. I made this Italian stew kind of thing yesterday that was pretty darn tasty! I might even post the recipe soon.
One of the questions presented to the filmmakers was how they were allowed such access into a public school. It turns out that Cindy Waitt is originally from Sioux City and has long ties there through her work with the Waitt Institute. The filmmakers were granted access for an entire year. They also shot in Oklahoma, Mississippi and Georgia. To show the committment the filmakers took in covering the topic they shot a total of 20 families shooting 300 hours of footage that they whittled down to five families for the 98 minute finished film.
Apart from it making you extra sexy, special, interesting and just generally amazing (no factual basis for these) it also has a profound effect on your overall health and well being. Just check out these little articles i found on the subject:
Fr Barron was only there for half an hour – a long day of travelling from Birmingham, via the Bird and Baby in Oxford, to London and a pretty demanding schedule quite understandably leaving him tired. But that didn’t stop us having a good Q&A session in which Fr Barron’s simple, effective, apologetic method – which is ably employed in the series – was on show. At the end, Fr Sherbrooke kindly left the last question to me – with, I hasten to add, about 3.4 seconds to formulate it!
Luther finally emerged into worldwide prominence when in 1517 he was named Holy Roman Empire Today’s “Most Pious Man Alive” and became known for some graffiti he had scrawled on the door of All Saints Church in Wittenburg. This posting of the so-called Ninety-five Theses has been greatly misunderstood by historians and only recently was clarified when the old door itself was located at a garage sale in East St. Louis, Missouri. It was long believed that Luther wrote the theses before-hand and then nailed them to the cathedral door as a sign of protest and to show his growing prowess as a wallboard installer.
This is an interesting idea, taking the same print, in differing sizes and pairing them together. I do like the way it looks, especially with the belt. I have the skirt (bought with the 20% promo) and it is beautiful. Many bloggers have done reviews of these pieces. If you have, would you mind dropping the links into the comments???
They are telling us that "time is running out".
Plus! Gold Kiwis are enriched with double the vitamin C of oranges and six times more vitamin E than apples! this hydrating and skin-brightening line keeps skin soft all day long while repairing sun damage with quercetin from the skin of the gold kiwi!
While there are no simple one-size-fits-all answers to these questions, I’ve been inspired to see the rich conversations and life changes motivated by such reflections. I’ve seen friends, clients, students, and fellow-parents living out their own responses to these questions— feeling small triumphs in making positive shifts, along with the struggles of not always being able to arrive at neat and tidy answers.
In this scenario, is there any such thing as sin? To be sure, there is ‘crime’ which is merely a violation of law against a human for which we might be accountable before a human court. But there is no sin in the sense of a violation of God’s Holy Law, a transgression against the Holy One. “If we claim we have not sinned, we make him out to be a liar and his word has no place in our lives.” Or, “All have sinned and fallen short of the glory of God.” So if there is no ultimate sin, then of what need is there for Redemption? And if there is no need for Redemption, of what need is there of Christ? Why, we might as well say Christ Jesus did not even exist if all that is true. And we might as well say that all that is in Scripture is untrue as well.
Today, we’re going to focus on the Monkey…
Now with a stronger private sector and FDI, we are brave enough to light candles and speak up against corruption. We “Teach India“. While the “weaponed classes” siphon off relief money, we go and help tsunami victims. We pay taxes and then travel in unclean, unsafe second class compartments of trains, unless the travel is “official”. It is a victory to get a ration card, a passport, or an election card. We are victims of corruption, our white money turns black in a million un-receipted ways, from a bus conductor who does not give you a ticket – to everything else. We tighten our belts. We hold the “Simple Living – High Thinking” Ideal. We are glad to get by and to be left alone.
"curious confusion"
I wasn’t tempted. It’s true,
Michael and Ryan, like so many other veterans, sought help from the Department of Veterans Affairs. Eric Shinseki, the secretary of veterans affairs, declined to speak to me, but the most common view among those I interviewed was that the V.A. has improved but still doesn’t do nearly enough about the suicide problem.
**NOTE: Strong holds is only in the New Testament once but appears in the Bible 19 times. 18 In the Old Testament in reference to forts, or physically built cites surrounded by protective walls. Here is the New Testament occurence in context.
But for now I'm relaxing away my evening sewing on Nearly Insane blocks and watching chick flicks on my kindle fire via Netflix!!
And maybe that shows now that the brothers have gone their separate ways. I’m not a great fan of Beady Eye the songs aren’t great whereas Noel Gallagher’s High Flying Bird’s tunes are class and Noel’s voice has without doubt changed and improved. I definitely have a new-found respect for Liam and what he did for the band, an absolutely great voice in some ways in fact. I just didn’t notice…
Back at home, I started prepping a roast chicken. Again it was requested by Isabelle for dinner. I was bashing up herbs while Melissa Izzy got ready for her portrait. As mentioned previously I bought some lamps for this purpose.
UDDP base
Research group IBON said that the profits of the Big 3 oil firms are rising rapidly with a record of at least P141.7 billion in profits in the last decade. This is more than the combined income of the country’s poorest 2.36 million families-amounting to Php 114.3 million in 2009.
Apparently, the Court would have been satisfied with some verbal description of these features, for they commented that "Pursuant to Article 36(2) of the Regulation, the application shall contain an indication of the products in which the design is intended to be incorporated or to which it is intended to be applied. Although paragraph 3 allows the option for the application to contain a description explaining the representation, Slewe restricted itself to the following "Indication of the product": "Pots (household), Pails, Plant pots, Flower boxes (outdoor), Lamps, Cribs for animal fodder". A description as a explaining the representation is absent, and the indication of the product is inaccurate or incomplete in that it fails to state that the product is a plant pot which can simultaneously act as a lamp. As a consequence, the Court of Appeal finds that it is to be assumed that the design merely discloses a pot made of a transparent material and containing one or more light sources, which is what the informed user must base his comparison of this pot and the VAS-ONE and the GG pot on (not a pot with integrated illumination contained in a double bottom)."
…answer 11 questions the tagger posted for you
85 Madame Bovary – Gustave Flaubert
At one point it was hard to say, but now we can: the answer is no. Or not any more than they can now. That’s because Adobe, the makers of Flash, have ceased development of Flash for Android.
SEC. 4. Scope. – The Comprehensive Agrarian Reform Law of 1988 shall cover, regardless of tenurial arrangement and commodity produced, all public and private agricultural lands as provided in Proclamation No. 131 and Executive Order No. 229, including other lands of the public domain suitable for agriculture.
The International Civil Aviation Organization named the deregulation as the major cause for the airline industry’s growth and structural change by suggesting “The adoption of liberalization measures by States to open up the air transport sector has been a major driving force for structural transformation of the airline industry. The traditional business model of the major network airline has come under scrutiny, particularly for airlines with global reach. The low-cost carrier (LCC) phenomenon continued to expand not only domestically but regionally and even globally.” (ICAO 2009 Annual Report, 16)
We have been very busy since we returned to Albuquerque, New Mexico. We have enjoyed seeing family--Steve's mom Zelda, James (left), and Tim (right), as well as our friends. Steve has already been busy working on our home, and we have done some traveling too. We are happy to be back in New Mexico with all its wonderful food and the great climate. We are excited to be here for the fall, which is our favorite time of year, especially when the Hatch green chili harvest arrives.
And there has been no big storm to test what Dr. Pilkey calls ”stack-a-shack” condominiums that line the beach in the island towns of Atlantic Beach and Emerald Isle.
Tripel Karmeliet: Aside from macaroni & cheese, hot dogs, cereal, and pancakes, bologna was the only thing I'd eat until I was about six years old. I was nuts for bologna. And while that love affair endured, it didn't have frills; I wanted only a few slices of Oscar Mayer bologna with dill pickle chips on white bread smothered in plain yellow mustard. Had my five-year-old self had his way, he'd have eaten this simple bologna sandwich for breakfast, lunch, and dinner.
B – Buffered B series
Punch: Martha Stewart
Step 10 (In Which My Photography Skills/Sanity Completely Desert Me): Here you can see the second layer of cheese and the top coating of grated chocolate. I don’t know why I thought this was an acceptable photo. Let’s count all the ways my photo is terrible. First of all, you can’t even see the layers of the tiramisu. Secondly, there’s a weird little section, bottom left, where it looks lopsided! Third, what a terrible angle!! (Or is that the same as the first reason?) All I can say is, at this point, I had sampled some cooking brandy and also was drinking Riunite while listening to my hockey team lose a game 7-5 despite outshooting their opponent 54-18. Thus, this inexplicably bad photo of my surprisingly good tiramisu:
In respect of pornography, many of you may approve of what is happening, however, I take the view that all censorship is dangerous, because you never know where it will end, and we, as a group are, after all no less censored than any dirty film maker. Furthermore, it is another example of legislation achieving an effect through the public perception of what it means, which it would never achieve if tested in a court of law.
Lower right (Maia's): cucumber slices; apricots; carrot; 1/4 sandwich; cantaloupe.
Establish a list of predetermined phrases or terminology for areas that can be narrowed down to a few options (e.g., “Click the CANCEL button” is a valid choice, whereas “Click CANCEL” and “Press CANCEL” are invalid options). Data validation will eliminate spelling and wording inconsistencies, and it will prevent other invalid content from being entered. Down the road, it will also increase your content reuse percentage when you load the content into a CMS.
It’s noble pursuit /
Okay Joe... you didn't have to get me a gift... but thanks.
oh, and while i am confessing, i have to apologize for my lack of posting regularly over the last few weeks. i am still learning how to balance it all---
To make grass jelly.....
have made out a case
I woke this morning to a white world gone icy overnight. There is an otherworldly stillness to the day, a thin shriek of sky overhead whose sole purpose, it seems, is to observe us puling mortals below.
Let us think for a little while, in the quiet of our own heads. Why are people monolingual, or multilingual? This is like asking why do people use chopsticks to eat their food, or why do people organise rodeo shows to entertain themselves. So the answer cannot be that it is because they wish to achieve enhancements by doing the one, or because they don’t know that enhancements can be achieved by not doing the other. The answer must be that chopsticks and rodeos are what makes sense around them. The languages that you use must therefore also make sense in the contexts where you live.
You’re used to, and enjoy, getting things your own way and doing exactly as you please. “What will be, will be” is your motto, and you don’t worry too much about tomorrow. This is fine as long as you don’t become so unconcerned that you neglect the things you should.
But ummm Los AngelOs? That's the one that threw me for a loop. Actually, it had me questioning my own spelling abilities. Maybe I've been spelling Los Angeles wrong for more than three decades (hush, I learned to write early).
visiting Jen's blog today. I'm all about keeping things neat, clean, and organized in our home, which isn't always easy while juggling life with my husband, a lively 2-year old son running around, and a full time job. But keeping our house organized truly gives me such JOY! So let me show you a couple of things I've done with our home.
with coffee drinks so one would think, but noooooooo, only
If you'd like to do this as an activity snack for vacation bible school or Sunday school, try this. Give the kids some pretzels, goldfish crackers, and blue icing. Then let them "catch" their own fish while you tell them the story. No oven required. :-)
(A nasty bit of entropy)
“Those tours are really extra special,” stresses Smith, “and just like our Creek tours, they give people lots of opportunities to just relax, de-stress and do some wildlife watching from a water vantage point.”
impress their tender weight upon us, and though
Transfer the dough to a lightly floured work surface and gently press to deflate. Divide the dough into 12 equal pieces (or 8 if you want really large rolls). Shape each piece into a ball and place on a baking sheet lined with parchment. Flatten the ball into a disk about 3 inches in diameter. Repeat with all of the dough then cover and let the rolls rise for about an hour, or until they are noticeably puffy.
As Songsalive! is a 501c)3) non profit charity, it is tax deductible. Ask for a receipt if necessary.
A friend sent me a link to listen to an online sermon this week, she called it a “tall glass of cool water for a weary soul”. Amen… that would be me…
I have decided I may need two positive thoughts in order to survive tomorrow.
4. Cleveland Browns RB Trent Richardson (Bama) Mike Holmgren, likes doing things his own way and will not bow to the pressure of taking a QB like RG3. Colt McCoy’s days are probably numbered but Cleveland tired of Peyton Hillis quick and looks for some fresh power and running skills to start of the draft. A QB could be in the mix in the second or later rounds.
One entry per person for every correct answer, like and retweet. Open to UK residents and 18+ years and over only I'm afraid, otherwise you're getting a bottle of year old squash I found in my bag last week.
I am on Schinias Beach near Marathon. Before the weekend , the weather forecast was saying that it would rain and be cloudy during the weekend, but it turned out to be false and it is quite fine ands shiny till now.
Reading a really good memoir and trying to seek inspiration from that.
Talkin’ ‘Bout Your Generation – Despite the fact Shaun Micallef threatens every week to completely take over the show with his nonsensical wordplay Talkin’ ‘Bout Your Generation is the only panel show on the air that comes close to Spicks & Specks. Amanda Keller, Charlie Pickering and even that goofball Josh Thomas are all great team captains; it really is a shame Shaun’s such a control freak. I love the guy, but I think maybe he could learn how to let other people have a joke now and again. It would also be good if he could talk to the contestants like he’s a human, and not constantly on the way to delivering yet another laboured pun of a punch line. Sorry, this was the ‘best’ of the year. Your Gen is good; Shaun just needs to work on his ego.
In writing this blog, I've been purposefully oblique about many details of my family life. The video finally reveals some of these, including photos of our neighborhood, my children, my husband, and yes, even one of me. As for the song choice, it's not a bit Parisian but the words seemed to capture what I most want to say to those with whom I spent time here and to Paris herself.
Happy holidays everyone and keep sweating!
After dinner and cake we played in the yard, I thought it was cute to see Derek trying to help Ryan put a bell on his bike - they can sometimes be like oil and water.
Whatever happens it is going to be an interesting couple of weeks.
Some people just refuse to have fun, I guess.
I have added a glittered star to the top of my tree. Hope you made sence of the tutorial, any queries just e-mail me. For more info on the materials and embellies on this card, just pop over to me blog here
